_	He is currently working on a project about the fragmentation and polarization of Europe’s identity as it grapples to come to terms with the realization that it can no longer isolate itself from the crisis unfolding just across the Mediterranean.
_	Its essence is the realization that an energy or life-force, conferred by Almighty Jah (God), exists within, and flows through, all people and all living things.
_	Giles’ longstanding educational philosophy was further borne out by the realization that early intervention (especially the first 3 years) has a lifelong effect on the brain’s wiring and sculpting, setting the stage for future competence and coping skills.
_	Horrified at the realization that he killed Emma's grandfather, Hook changes his mind about proposing and pockets the ring.
_	Upon landing at Hilo, the Honolulu Star-Bulletin wired ""...public and official enthusiasm exceeding any similar demonstrations in the history of this island city...a vast crowd at the airport, drawn from all sections of the island in the realization that the flight opens a new era in Hawaii transportation...long before the arrival of the Sikorskys all sides of the Waiakea airport was lined by hundreds of automobiles.
_	A number of software applications either explicitly or implicitly take attention economy into consideration in their user interface design, based on the realization that if it takes the user too long to locate something, they will find it through another application.
_	It helps people control their sense of terror and nullify the realization that humans are just animals trying to manage the world around them.
_	Chantry and Walks-by-Night back-track him and come to the realization that he was with a woman and boy and they had been chased and he had been killed.
_	In modern terms, this was the realization that the geological process of metamorphism had gradually transformed softer grades of coal, such as lignite, into harder grades, such as anthracite.
_	He continued, "I think [Duke]'s come to the realization that if you revenge, be prepared to dig two graves."
_	After the realization that college sports were becoming involved seriously with gambling and fraud the idea that offering athletes a free education would get rid of that culture.
_	Perhaps owing to the realization that there is really no such thing as a "stain" in genuine heraldry, as well as the desire to create new and unique designs, the use of these colours for general purposes has become accepted in the twentieth and twenty-first centuries.
_	Upon the realization that neither of them has had sexual relations in a while, they start toying with the idea of sleeping together.
_	He also comes to the realization that unlike Sack, John actually cared for Claire and made her happy.
_	The singer added that fairy tales gave "this idea that somebody's gonna come along and fix your life", but eventually "I sort of came to the realization that actually nobody's gonna fix your life for you, you have to do it yourself.
_	"The stadium is named for the late Emory P. Mitchell as a permanent and lasting memorial to a devoted public servant who, in his lifetime, sought no praise or commendation for his efforts except the realization that his community had benefited from his work," according to the formal remarks presented at the dedication.
_	According to Cohen, "traditional" enlightenment is the realization of the transcendental aspect of God, and it often goes hand in hand with the realization that the world is an illusion.
_	Johanna Hall's recollection is that the realization that there was a dearth of songs about long-term relationships came to her while she was doing laundry, and that she handed John Hall a napkin on which she'd written the song's lyric.
_	Sternwood is at once heartbroken and incensed by the realization that his son is dead.
_	In the end they cope with the realization that neither has the musical career they dreamed about.
_	She had to surmount a lifetime of denial and come to terms with the realization that her father was not the upstanding citizen that he and the family portrayed him to be.
_	It was by that time that Barago came to the realization that he despised Makai Knights more than Horrors as he devoured them as well.
_	Another type of religiousness is one characterized by the realization that the individual is sinful and is the source of untruth.
_	The other reason for shorter break-in regimens today is that a greater amount of science has been applied to the understanding of break-in, and this has led to the realization that some of the old, long, painstaking break-in regimens were based on specious reasoning .
_	Forced to the realization that he was not having enough fun as a would-be hedonist to justify the lifestyle, he decided to become a full-time writer.
_	This voyage lead Vespucci to the realization that he had not reached Asia, but instead a "New World."
_	Throughout his career, Rozsda made figurative and abstract drawings and often a unique combination of the two, although this variability in subject matter and technique does not contradict the realization that this part of his oeuvres is inspired by the same surrealist ambition aimed at the liberation of the imagination and the representation of the hidden occupants of the mind.
_	The move was driven by the realization that, in defending their homeland, conventional warfare is no longer an option.
_	Riggs' vision for KGI was based on the realization that life sciences would dominate the 21st century and that new institutions were needed to educate the future leaders in this realm.
_	Cohen and Winn close with the realization that contrary to economic theory many firms are not perfect optimisers.
_	On the way back from the raids, pilots shot up ground targets of opportunity, and also used belly shackles to carry bombs on short-range missions, which led to the realization that the P-47 could perform a dual-function on escort missions as a fighter-bomber.
_	At its peak the total of shield volunteers in Baghdad numbered about 500, but the realization that the thousands needed to have a chance of stopping attacks on Baghdad had not materialized, combined with the failure of the United Nations to forestall war, meant that bombing was imminent.
_	Often, it is only after the realization that a poorly chosen name results in an undesired impression that a person or group decides on a different name.
_	FBI special agent Dale Cooper (Kyle MacLachlan) has been sent to the town to investigate and has come to the realization that the killer was Laura's father, Leland Palmer (Ray Wise), who acted while possessed by a demonic entity, Killer BOB (Frank Silva).
_	In a round-about way it brings Colman to the realization that it is not "what" you are that is important, but rather who you know yourself to be.
_	However, the realization that the .30-06 Springfield cartridge was too long for the prototype gun's mechanism to easily and reliably work with resulted in the discarding of the project.
_	the realization that he is putting his friend in danger for his own purposes unsettles him greatly, and he is prepared to call off his clandestine search for his mother entirely to protect them.
_	Thorpe slowly comes to the realization that Kemp is fully aware of his crime, and engages him in a deadly game of cat and mouse in an effort to silence him forever.
_	Even sadder is the realization that some of the old cornball movies are still fresher, more alive, than this regurgitation."
_	The French Panama Canal Company, headed by Ferdinand de Lesseps, had been attempting to build a sea-level canal, but came to the realization that this was impractical.
_	Qi then suggested to Sima Wei to take the chance to kill Empress Jia's relatives and take over the government, but Sima Wei hesitated—and at the same time, Empress Jia came to the realization that killing Sima Liang and Wei, if it had been realized that she intended it, could bring a political firestorm and that also Sima Wei would not be easily controlled.
_	In "Eli Matchett", Liz comes to the realization that even if her name is cleared, it's impossible for her to go back to the life she once knew and must rely on Red to help her survive as a criminal.
_	Burton Kirkwood stated, "Out of the disaster emerged the realization that a viable civil society existed in Mexico.
_	However, she ran away after being confronted with the realization that life has no meaning.
_	And now man just the realization that what you have is the best for you, and the best you could ever do in your lifetime.
_	He pays Carla a visit in prison with the realization that he lost.
_	She marvels both at her newfound compassion and at the realization that her husband would never have allowed her to make such a decision were he present (“What Kind of Woman”).
_	Once Lonnie and Minnie Relf came to the realization that their daughters were sterilized without their consent, they filed for a lawsuit with the help of the Southern Poverty Law Center.
_	In the case of Iceland he writes, “their outrage from the realization that the democratic institutions did not represent the interests of citizens because the political class had become a self-reproducing cast that was catering to the interests of the financial elite, and to the preservation of their monopoly over the state,” (Castells, p. 42, 2012.)
_	As the angst bleeds through from the pain of the realization that the narrator is alone, with no parents, the music lingers around the dominant in the uneasy A major.
_	The holonovel's genre was later changed to a work of Gothic fiction set in 1840s England after Mulgrew refused to work with horses, and the realization that shooting outdoor locations would exceed the show's budget.
_	Cincotti developed an interest in competitive eating as a child, but he was unsuccessful in his first effort to make it past a qualifier for the annual Fourth of July Nathan's competition, describing that he "was only able to eat 13 hot dogs", which forced him to come to the realization that he "had to work at this if I was going to get to the top level."
_	This, along with the realization that the situation of the Jews in Hungary was becoming precarious, prompted Szenes to embrace Zionism, and she joined "Maccabea", a Hungarian Zionist students organization.
_	His motivations might have been to avoid marriage, gain money, or feeling compelled into the crime by his father, but now that he is facing the scaffold he is overcome by the realization that he has killed the girl and caused pain to his family.
_	Shortly thereafter, Hearst due to the realization that his wife thinks he's guilty of the murders and the resulting meaningless as to his own existence he makes a false confession to the crimes, just as detectives are notified that the real killer has been arrested after being "caught in the act."
_	A private pilot for over forty years, Mr Oldham's professional work developing clean transportation collaborations between businesses and government combined with the introduction of the Alpha Electro all-electric airplane by Pipistrel lead to the realization that a similar collaboration could be used to reduce the relatively high cost of flight training and bring new opportunities to youth in the San Joaquin Valley.
_	However, closer scrutiny led to the realization that the museums, which had long been housed in the House of the Estates, with their important collections, were an unpredictable temporal uncertainty.
_	After two years, he transferred in 1984 to Northwestern University as a theater major to study performance, emboldened by the realization that he loved performing, even when no one was coming to shows.
_	With the realization that volunteer coaches are only one aspect of the youth sports equation, NYSCA evolved into the National Alliance for Youth Sports in 1993.
_	He finally comes to the realization that Jenn only uses him when she needs him.
_	Now frivolously disregarding the huge financial and productive power of America and, according to ... von Puttkamer, blind to the realization that this power could be projected across the Atlantic, he gained renewed confidence in a victorious outcome to the war.
_	Also during 1719, the under-construction New Orleans had been entirely flooded (6 inches or higher), with the realization that higher ground or levees would be needed for the inland port of that Crescent City.
_	Though he assured her he would help her escape, she came to the realization that she would never be free under Stenbeck's thumb and made the decision to give Cabot up for adoption in order to ensure his safety.
_	As the nuns assemble for prayer, they are struck with the realization that the statue of the Virgin Mary is back in its place and Teresa is kneeling in front of it, properly habited, firmly in prayer.
_	She proceeds to follow the soldier after he comes to the realization that his company isn't coming back, and he decides to leave the fighting behind and return home.
_	"It gave us all goose bumps to hear Robert's voice on our record, to hear his voice on another song, and to come to the realization that we actually wrote the music to it, because it sounds like a Cure song.
_	Toni comes to the realization that Andre would be happier in the wild, being a wild animal, and he is subsequently released.
_	After the realization that their forms of organizing were outdated, these foreign companies began implementing one of the most successful business techniques in America.
_	After occupational safety procedures were put into place following the realization that the metal caused berylliosis around 1950, acute beryllium poisoning became extremely rare.
_	Gary comes to the realization that the man sitting next to him not only "looks" like Elvis Presley but that he actually "is" Presley.
_	Examples might be the discovery that a Purchasing Officer maintained parallel records in a spreadsheet, or the realization that a member of the project team had an agenda relating more to the authority of a particular business unit than to the improvement of information available to the business.
_	In addition to being a reaction to the realization that a nuclear war between the two superpowers would ensure the destruction of not only the socialist system but the entirety of humanity, it also reflected the USSR's strategic military disposition - the move away from large, and possibly politically offensive, military ventures towards a force centered on proxy wars and a strategic nuclear missile force.
_	And then the realization that it had gone into its third ad break with all its plot threads still hanging made me groan (although not out loud).
_	At the wake, Rowena comes to the realization that, like Andy, she never belonged and finally decides to leave Jess.
_	This interest is driven particularly by the realization that a positive work environment can result in desirable outcomes such as more favorable job attitudes and increased work performance.
_	During the early 1890s Finch switched careers from painting to pottery, upon the realization that he couldn't make a living by painting.
_	"Rolling Stone" critic Stephen Holden regarded "We Have No Secrets" as exemplifying the theme of "No Secrets", which he saw as the "difficulty of being happy," by "painfully" expressing "the realization that emotion and rationalization are often irreconcilable."
_	The connection to the Anosov flow comes from the realization that formula_17 is the geodesic flow on "P" and "Q".
_	The added financing by the Chamber of Commerce groups was insufficient and the group TAG Techniques d'Avant Garde became the main shareholder of Air Alpes, with a recovery package put into place after the realization that a number of routes were not profitable.
_	Then, after five or ten years came the realization that "" or "Barry Lyndon" or "The Shining" was like nothing else before or since."
_	After arguing over surgical cases for the entirety of the day, Yang comes to the realization that she needs a cardiothoracic surgeon to work at the hospital.
_	Wansell notes that Grisham returned to one of his seminal themes of the idealistic young lawyer fighting with the realization that corporations only care about maximizing profits.
_	Vedder not having done the lyrics yet, and added that the lyrical inspiration was the realization that "I had to go inside myself first before I could be open to outside ideas."
_	This results from the realization that the Coleorrhyncha are just "living fossil" relatives of the traditional Heteroptera, close enough to them to be united with that group.
_	Bo comes to be inspired and supported by the group of supposed delinquents he meets in anger management, deals with the realization that Mr S. is gay, and starts dating his classmate Shelly, whose athleticism surpasses even Bo's own.
_	Ongoing academic research is important because the realization that water manifests itself as clusters rather than an isotropic collection may help explain many anomalous water characteristics such as its highly unusual density temperature dependence.
_	As he said in 1903, "It might be my privilege to have a part in the building of school that would turn the minds of youth back from this exaggerated concept of the value of book knowledge, to the realization that all this is valuable only as it becomes a background for, or the foundation under, the real things of life."
_	Brooks said Wyatt's introduction sends Liam "reeling with the realization that Hope's heart, may not, in fact, be perpetually on hold for him!"
_	With the realization that he was not meant to be a red-hot lover, Barney calls his wife on the phone, inviting her to the apartment.
_	In 2014 a (re)review of the episode by James Hunt provided the realization that the opening scene of "A Matter of Perspective", where the character Data analyzes paintings was a preview of the episode's theme.
_	In this third installment of The Princess Diaries, Mia's self-deprecating wit, self-absorption, and adolescent angst are as entertaining as ever as she struggles with the realization that despite being a princess, she isn't guaranteed any fairy-tale endings.
_	Her marriage as a teenager ended almost immediately with the realization that "when men try to make love to me, something in me fights".
_	During the course of writing the screenplay, Raucher came to the realization that despite growing up with Oscy and having bonded with him through their formative years, the two had never really had any meaningful conversations or gotten to know one another on a more personal level.
_	As a result, 'the keen and bitter Carbo got nothing from his trip to Gaul, except the realization that his father had been guilty and had been sent into exile by a man of complete integrity'
_	After the disappointing performance of the SS units under his command and the realization that he neither the Finnish nor the German high command is going to provide him with additional forces or substantial reinforcements, he slowed down the advance towards the east and instead concentrated on clearing and securing the area.
_	The movie ends with the realization that each are bound to Satan and that Melissa's attempt to save herself has only managed to draw Jodie into the evil contract as well.
_	What moves us, reasonably enough, is not the realization that the world falls short of being completely just – which few of us expect – but that there are clearly remediable injustices around us which we want to eliminate.
_	However, a few months into researching Newton's life, Hochschild came to the realization that "the story was the movement and not Newton."
_	On the surface, the song seems to be about "the realization that a person isn't right for you, that the relationship has gone bad".
_	This arrangement reflected the realization that local JCCs were the primary site of community book fairs.
_	As Punky herself embarked on junior high, her avant-garde day-glo and multicolored attire, along with her pigtails, segued into more traditional teenage styles, and her declaration of, and reliance on "Punky Power!" gave way to the realization that intelligence, common sense and a strong will can get one out of any problem.
_	After nine days, out of food and water, they returned to the shore at an isolated beach further south, with the realization that they would probably be killed just as quickly as Michele.
_	The main factors in their decision was the lack of economic opportunities and general devastation resulting from years of conflict, and the realization that Spanish colonial control had simply been replaced by American neo-colonial control.
_	While reeling from the death of Sharon, the squad has to deal with the murder of DDA Emma Rios and the realization that Phillip Stroh has returned.
_	Webber returns to his wife, Adele (Loretta Devine), seeking forgiveness, but is left devastated at the realization that she has been spending the night with another man.
_	The decreasing rate of construction is due to the realization that too many power plants had been built and some existing plants were being used far below capacity.
_	When his high school crush Susan Andrews (Susan Oliver) is admitted to the hospital after a suicide attempt, Jerome gradually comes to the realization that his problem is a result of his years-long obsession with her.
_	Meanwhile, Veronica deals with the aftermath of the realization that Jake Kane (Kyle Secor) is likely her biological father.
_	This was due to the realization that, under the circumstances, it was impossible to break away from the Communist bloc.
_	Historian Zane Miller argues that urban history was rejuvenated in mid-20th century by the realization that the cultural importance of the city went far beyond art galleries and museums.
_	Briggs proposed a "new solution" then emerging, in which the African American had come to the realization that “the salvation of his race and an honorable solution of the American Race Problem call for action and decision in preference to the twaddling, dreaming, and indecision of ‘leaders.’”
_	He once declared, "I have come to the realization that the most important thing I can do in the church, and that applies to Christians in general, is to live simply in order to give money to the poor."
_	Rosalind is faced with the realization that she will never find love or marry.
_	With the realization that many polka music fans from Ohio and the Steel Belt have retired to warmer climates, WINT also began and serves as base operation for a 24/7 streaming polka website, 247polkaheaven.com which was the first of its kind in the world.
_	Emerging from the realization that there was an absence of student perspective in pressing policy issues, participants in the IPF strive to add their voice to public debate.
_	Toomey did, however, say that he felt that the plotting was "a bit of a stretch," and noted that the realization that Krenshaw was actually a Russian spy named Kremenski was "out of nowhere" and "a bit confusing."
_	Under Israeli pressure to send its own SOF teams into western Iraq and the realization that British SAS were already hunting SCUDs, US Secretary of Defense Dick Cheney proposed using US SR teams as well as SAS.
_	Meanwhile, Marty is dejected by the realization that the other zebras can do everything he can, believing himself no longer unique.
_	Another necessary ingredient was the realization that electrons are indistinguishable, as expressed in the Pauli principle.
_	A message from his mother that the actor was unable to arrive on time, however, jolts the plotters into the realization that Sir Simon has truly been resurrected.
_	It was after reaching this point—the realization that salvation was possible only because of divine mercy—that the person would experience justification, when the righteousness of Christ is imputed to the elect and their minds and hearts are regenerated.
_	Chris Carmack as Will Lexington, a rising country star struggling with the realization that he might be gay, as well as Scarlett and Gunnar's new neighbor; Lennon Stella as Maddie Conrad, Rayna's older daughter, legal daughter to Teddy, and biological daughter to Deacon; and Maisy Stella as Daphne Conrad, Rayna and Teddy's younger daughter.
_	The attempts of Oedipus, the incumbent ruler, to allay the plague bring him only to the realization that he is the cause of the plague.
_	Among its many applications the PDF formalism led to solution of the long sought 'load-independent index of diastolic function' (LIIDF) problem, and to the realization that left ventricular volume at diastasis is the in vivo equilibrium volume of the left ventricle.
_	Although tempted to kill Garibaldi, Bester instead removed the commands and left Garibaldi to cope with the realization that he had betrayed everyone he knew on all sides.
_	With the realization that some soldiers could not read well enough to complete the Alpha test, the Beta test (consisting of pictures and diagrams) was administered.
_	Merry suggested that, regardless of cultural differences, the story is universal due to "its themes of loss and family loyalty, not to mention the realization that life may not align with our idealized expectations".
_	The encounter with Caldrian leads the player to the realization that they were part of a witch hunter squad who battled a witch and apparently killed her.
_	The idea of a twist ending, where a terrible discovery is made worse by the realization that it is only part of a larger horror, was used again in "The Shunned House", written later that year.
_	Startled by the realization that her husband was not from earth, Heather fled until she found herself confronted by Dhasha Khan who transformed her into the Silver Dragon and was forced to fight her now grown up son.
_	Cultural Scripts – if people play hard to get enough, eventually win the affection of person trying to love – usually work against the realization that the relationship is unattainable.
_	He claims this led to the realization that he needs help, as he is sad and needs a friend.
_	In his review, Parry panned the film for its poor writing, and virtual plagiarism of entire scenes from other films; while also writing, "If there's one benefit to watching "Virus" and "DNA", it's in the realization that special effects technicians, no matter how skilled in that field, should never take part in any other task on a film shoot."
_	He came to the realization that the World Wide Web would become the "Great Equalizer" and de facto platform for online commerce.
_	Since the realization that the embryophytes emerged from within the green algae, some authors are starting to include them.
_	Longshot leaves the Exiles to reestablish a relationship with Dazzler but the couple splits ways due in part to Dazzler's frustration with other women's attraction to Longshot, but mainly because of the realization that Longshot is no longer the man she loved because of his amnesia.
_	They also begin to understand object permanence, which is the realization that objects continue to exist when removed form view.
_	Moksha (liberation) therefore is described as the realization that all finite reality is essentially dependent on the Supreme.
_	In Gunn's convertible, Mario is coming to the realization that Gunn wasn't lying when he said the gang members weren't human, and that Los Angeles really can chew you up and spit you out.
_	An argument with Renzo leads him to the realization that their biggest blunder may be his inability to change.
_	He came to the realization that much of the saris in popular demand at the time, were imported from neighbouring countries, and that locally hand-crafted materials were seldom used or appreciated.
_	The modern city was incorporated in 1837 by Northern businessmen and grew rapidly from real estate speculation and the realization that it had a commanding position in the emerging inland transportation network, based on lake traffic and railroads, controlling access from the Great Lakes into the Mississippi River basin.
_	Their greatest setback came with the realization that faulty surveying coupled with corrupt local government officials had left them with virtually nothing."
_	At this point Isyllt and Savedra come to the realization that their investigations may be intertwined and they begin working together.
_	With the realization that Ida saved the lives of Lynette's family at the cost of her own, she begins to feel guilty for barely getting to know Ida.
_	He briefly considered resigning his position with the UN and returning to the Soviet Union in an attempt to change the system from within, but he soon came to the realization that it would have been an impossible task, as he had neither the power nor the influence to effect any significant change.
_	Janelle is also in denial and must face the realization that she has failed to protect her daughter within the confines of their own home.
_	While in the bathroom, he has an attack, and dies with the realization that the woman is too prudish to enter and save him.
_	That report, the appointment of Bernadine Healy as the first woman to lead the NIH, and the realization that important clinical trials had excluded women led to the creation of the Women's Health Initiative at the NIH and to the federal legislation, the 1993 National Institutes of Health Revitalization Act, which mandated that women and minorities be included in NIH-funded research.
_	By the 18th, everyone settled down with the realization that there was much to be done in spite of the cessation of hostilities.
_	The purpose of Deity yoga is to bring the meditator to the realization that the deity and the practitioner are in essence the same, non-dual.
_	Despite the attempts to improve the J 2's performance and handling, by late in the summer of 1916 Hugo Junkers had come to the realization that the continued use of sheet electrical steel was no longer practical for aircraft construction, writing in his diary that:
_	This act of faith and kindness—combined with the realization that his gang had left him to be captured without a moment's hesitation—fanned Eel's longstanding dissatisfaction with his criminal life and his desire to reform.
_	Luke come to the realization that the "other" of whom Yoda spoke is Princess Leia (Carrie Fisher), who is his twin sister.
_	Months later, both have separately come to the realization that, despite their differences, they are better together.
_	From the fact that the story of the Jewish festival of Hanukkah is recorded in the Catholic Bible's Book of Maccabees, but not in the Hebrew Bible; to the way the ancient Jewish prayer for the New Moon had to be changed after the first lunar moon landing—taking out the phrase, "but we have never touched you"; to the fact that, after World War II, German money helped print a 17-volume edition of the Talmud – when the Survivors' Talmud (also known as the "U.S. Army Talmud", because it was dedicated to the U.S. Army) was published, based on the realization that many Jews in the displaced persons camps were as hungry for Jewish books as they were for food; to scientific theories offered by a Russian about the way an unusual alignment of the planets caused the splitting of the Red Sea; to the way Talmudic rabbis, not Benjamin Franklin, invented the lightning rod, his articles were read by lay people and Jewish leaders alike.
_	Founded on the realization that there is a general lack of legal clarity globally about the relationship between sustainability and investors’ fiduciary duty, the programme engaged with and interviewed over 400 policymakers and investors to raise awareness of the importance of ESG issues to the fiduciary duties of investors.
_	Also noted was the "completely erratic and borderline insane" behavior of Ellis at the realization that her daughter is focusing more on her love life than on her career, learning that the specialty, which she considers to be defining for a surgeon, is not a concern of Meredith's:
_	After they maliciously vandalize his house, Ormont comes to the realization that he truly hates the human race, and these examples of it in particular, and can only be happy if they are made to pay.
_	He called for the realization that the United States is in a more-or-less permanent state of war with these forces.
_	Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) Special Agent Dale Cooper (Kyle MacLachlan) has been sent to the town to investigate, and has come to the realization that the killer was possessed by a demonic entity—Killer BOB (Frank Silva).
_	As companies battled ever more fiercely for a better return on their investment and greater market share, they eventually came to the realization that purchasing was spending, on average, one-half of corporate sales income, and began demanding that purchasing make positive contributions to attaining corporate goals.
_	The new approach is based on the realization that task-performing networks follow some underlying principles that are should be reflected and therefore be detected in their activity.
_	With this discovery, came the realization that movement of ice sheets might act to concentrate meteorites in certain areas.
_	There is a small spark of humanity, but it is "clouded by this huge sense of negative self-worth and the realization that she is expendable."
_	The album brought out the realization that yes, the country's first honest-to-goodness R&B has arrived.
_	Because of the historical legacy having once controlled mainland China, the army has traditionally been the most important of the ROC's military forces, although this has declined in recent years with the realization that the traditional army's role in defending against a PRC invasion is limited.
_	With the realization that Michael is after Laurie, Loomis orders Gummell to drive back to Haddonfield.
_	She cares for him, cleaning and sterilizing his wounds, and is suddenly struck by the realization that she has fallen in love with her captor.
_	On 24 July, the French ambassador in London tried to waken Grey to the realization that once Austrian forces crossed the Serbian border, it would be too late for mediation.
_	Importantly, RNA was found to be much more abundant in the mammalian transcriptome than previously thought, accompanied with the realization that the genome was pervasively transcribed.
_	"After additional medical evaluations and creative treatments, my doctors and I have come to the realization that there is no solution that will allow me to continue to play football.
_	In 2012, the Company cut ~2000 positions in the United States, most in sales, in response to anticipated revenue downturns from the hypertension drug Diovan, which was losing patent protection, and the realization that the anticipated successor to Diovan, Rasilez, was failing in clinical trials.
_	The philosophy of the club is based on the realization that the challenges that humanity is facing can only be overcome through the development of a global cultural consciousness.
_	He responds by backing away, as if recoiling from the realization that she is indeed the "Harbinger of Death."
_	Once he meets Silk, he is faced with the realization that financial gain is nothing compared to the development of one's artistic ability.
_	After Marks kills Bobby and is subsequently arrested, Jax comes to the realization that the time has come to fulfill his father's legacy and bring the club fully into legitimate ventures.
_	This led her to the realization that, as she put it, "we all spend so much time talking... but we never really communicate."
_	The last field season also undertook a systematic survey of non-burial structures, leading to the realization that these hundreds of burials were apparently located under ancient houses -- although no traces of them remain - as well as among the various trash pits, and that Tlatilco was not a necropolis, but rather a major chiefdom center.
_	But though she believed Paul now, she had been shaken by the realization that an error on her part caused the widower's wife to die.
_	Lida has some remorse because of society and their views on premarital sex, but then comes to the realization that it is her life saying "I wanted to do it and I did it; and I felt so happy".
_	“It is the realization that the journey up the mountain is more valuable to our spirit than the view from the summit.
_	When the heroes find out that Jekyll's direct death resulted in the death of Hyde as well, they come to the realization that the Queen can only die if Regina herself, as the original form, was killed.
_	He is horrified at the realization that Kiss-Shot will now hunt humans again, and that he himself will want to hunt as well.
_	There was a feeling of it not being the same way it had been, and the realization that things were not always going to remain the same."
_	The experience of submerging drives home the realization that our existence in this world is transient, and we should strive towards more lasting goals."
_	Eventually, he then comes to the realization that he needs to admit and confront his "gay side" (in a parody of Luke Skywalker confronting his dark-side in "The Empire Strikes Back").
_	The Portuguese pilots, assisted by the physician-astronomer Master João Faras and his astronomical instruments, determine that the land lies east of the Tordesillas line, prompting Pedro Álvares Cabral to formally claim Brazil for the Portuguese crown, bestowing upon it the name of "Ilha de Vera Cruz" ("Island of the True Cross"—later renamed "Terra de Santa Cruz", "Land of the Holy Cross", upon the realization that it is not an island).
_	They both overcome their fears with the realization that Hyun-bin is Tae-hee reincarnated, and they are soulmates.
_	Land Arts hinges on the primacy of first person experience and the realization that human-land relationships are rarely singular.
_	With the realization that he'd rather deal with gangsters and gunmen than "respectable" bankers, Snaps decides to abandon his short-lived honest ways and return to a life of crime (looking skyward and admitting to his father, "Sorry, pop... I did the best I could").
_	The SdKfz 265 was designed to fulfill a growing need within the German Army for a command tank, following the realization that the leaders of a massive panzer formation would themselves have to travel in a tank of some type.
_	Mike Crando from Anime News Network highly enjoyed Kenshin's characterization in the prequel as he refers it as "it is a fascinating and emotional character study in its own right" due to Kenshin's character development across these four episodes from "an idealistic youth to a cold-hearted killer, only to be redeemed through love lost and the realization that swinging his sword is destroying his own life as well as the lives of the people on the receiving end".
_	A very important achievement was the realization that the quantum spin Hall state remains to be non-trivial even after the introduction of spin-up spin-down scattering, which destroys the quantum spin Hall effect.
_	He leaves his job and goes back home, giving away all his books but "The Bhagavatam", maybe due to the realization that all these knowledge gave him nothing at all.
_	Beans, the rats' spiritual leader, is crushed by the realization that the rats are just mindless animals at heart, and leaves with his assistant Peaches.
_	Just before the climax, they come to the realization that others were behind their enmity, so they patch up their differences and take on their foes.
_	Her time with the team came with the revelation that she was pregnant, despite not having sex and the realization that the child was the unborn life essence of the child conceived when the Predator entity raped the first Star Sapphire.
_	Minutes later, however, she gets a call from Harvey (who has since reported her missing) and breaks down with the realization that in ten years of marriage, they have done nothing as a couple.
_	Later in the book, Polly finds out that the prosperous Shaws are on the brink of bankruptcy, and she guides them to the realization that a wholesome family life is the only thing they will ever need, not money or decoration.
_	"Generalmajor" Gonell had previously believed that other German forces would attack and relieve his besieged forces, but by 15 February came to the realization that this was not going to happen.
_	In 2004, the New York State Department of Transportation began studies on the Fire Island Inlet span after the realization that it was rapidly decomposing due to flaws in the cement during its construction.
_	After multiple people start showing up to her address for a yard sale that was advertised in the PennySaver, she comes to the realization that God placed the ad in the PennySaver to make sure that she has her garage sale on that specific day.
_	Moreover, the realization that most metamorphic belts are not the product of a single geothermal gradient indicates a more complex mechanism.
_	Instead of poisoning the girl, the fermented must caused her to pass out to awaken the next morning with the realization that life was worth living.
_	Only six months after settling into his new position, Park soon came to the realization that children in the Baltimore dispensaries were receiving significantly lower quality care as compared to children who could afford to be treated at the hospital.
_	The "weight" or burden of glory, according to Lewis, consists in the realization that the redeemed shall be approved by God and "delighted in as an artist delights in his work or a father in a son."
_	After several years of delayed openings, and the realization that the initial goal of a museum on Fifth Avenue was not sustainable, the decision was made to broaden the project's scope, and the current target for opening in the organization's new home was 2015.
_	Also, the act of sharing is coupled along with the realization that boundaries have expanded and that they may never return to their original state.
_	As Arlen's relationships with his newfound friends grow, he must come to terms with his past and the realization that he doesn't hold all the answers.
_	The nondualistic traditions such as Adi Shankara's Advaita Vedanta tradition of Hinduism champion a monistic premise, asserting that the individual human soul and Brahman are identical, only ignorance, impulsiveness and inertia leads to suffering through Saṃsāra, in reality they are no dualities, meditation and self-knowledge is the path to liberation, the realization that one's soul is identical to Brahman is moksha, and spiritual liberation is achievable in this life ("jivanmukti").
_	Soon, some of the extracts find their way into the hands of the COs, resulting in Officer Donaldson being mocked by both his colleagues and the inmates alike upon the realization that he is the inspiration for one of the characters.
_	He comes to the realization that no matter how hard he tries, he can never fully escape the drug life.
_	During the course of the documentary the realization that there were no official noodling contests spawned the First Annual Okie Noodling Tournament held in Pauls Valley, Oklahoma.
_	Hoja also realizes this, and as the two men learn more about each other, the realization that Hoja could trade places with him and return to Italy without any problems becomes a source of distress for the narrator.
_	They meet after Ava has the realization that it’s her own fault for the way their marriage is and wanted to apologize.
_	Chris Martins of "The A.V. Club" gave the EP a grade of A−, saying: "The only bummer comes with the realization that more than half the backing tracks are reduxed from "Maniac Meat", but perhaps "LA UTI" is a bridge to something bigger."
_	Now surrounded by younger prettier women at the dances, she comes to the realization that all the good men of her generation have emigrated or have been spoken for; and her only remaining hope for marriage is with the alcoholic and unreliable Bowser Egan.
_	Soil and water samples were collected from all over the world, leading to the discovery of streptomycin (derived from "Streptomyces griseus"), and the realization that bacteria, not just fungi, represent an important source of pharmacologically active natural products.
_	After the second chorus, there is an instrumental break where she sings about the realization that her father did not want to hurt her but she still ran away.
_	Kramer and Douglas are left stranded, with the realization that the explosion was meant to kill them.
_	The interpretation of people alone valuing material objects ties the individual representations of the six tapestries together and allows them to flow towards the realization that, while people may live alongside the natural and mythical worlds (which, in medieval times, were likely considered the same), they remain separate and not completely in either due to their unique desires.
_	The real work on KHTML actually started between May and October 1999, with the realization that the choice facing the project was "either do a significant effort to move KHTML forward or to use Mozilla" and with adding support for scripting as the highest priority.
_	A large proportion of the articles in these newsletters were related to missions theory, indicating the realization that until these questions of theory were resolved the role of student volunteers could not be clarified.
_	He has said that the technique allows for the realization that the film is "about other things", a similar plot outline that appears in the stage play "Glengarry Glen Ross" and its film adaptation in which the mentioned robbery is never shown on camera.
_	I think "Interview" was the start of the slide towards the realization that this is a business now, and that's also a part of what the business had become.
_	This shift was caused by the realization that patients who had defected with them from Janov's institute "had been "faking" their primals."
_	A second reason was the realization that only a finite amount of profit could be milked from price negotiations and that there was more profit to be made in increasing the total level of sales.
_	He failed a few times, but his failures finally led to the realization that the performance characteristics he was seeking might be obtained by using permanent magnet steel for the rotor instead of the original squirrel cage induction type rotor.
_	The information paradox is born out of the realization that all the quantum nature (information) of the matter and energy that falls into a classic black hole is thought to entirely vanish from existence into the zero-volume singularity at its heart.
_	Through the depiction of Mamatė (a diminutive derivation from "mother") the author expresses the realization that physical life is temporary and longs for permanent metaphysical existence (death).
_	During that time, Betty has the realization that no man could ever replace Bradley and even more so when she finds out that he’s in the hospital.
_	The motivation of the Chinese was probably the realization that an allied force of 20,000 men had landed in China and retribution for the siege was at hand.
_	Suddenly, he comes to the realization that Denver Jack must also be blackmailing Allen.
_	In the 1990s, Hans Monderman's studies of driver behavior led him to the realization that signs and regulations had an adverse effect on a driver's ability to interact safely with other road users.
_	FBI special agent Dale Cooper (Kyle MacLachlan) has been sent to the town to investigate and has come to the realization that the killer was the father of Laura, Leland Palmer (Ray Wise), who acted while possessed by a demonic entity—Killer BOB (Frank Silva).
_	One led from the realization that no one in the nascent industry really understood the effects of real-world weather on the operations of jet engines, especially in icing conditions.
_	Yellott said the change resulted from "the realization that the entire world, and the United States in particular, was running out of fluid fuels, and that we must find a way to gain economic access to the limitless energy of the sun."
_	After several trysts together, Jamie comes to the realization that this is not really what she wants and she would like to start dating again.
_	She continues onward, but on observing a walker that looks similar to herself, suddenly comes to the realization that her mindless walking is for naught; she slaughters the walkers that surround her and her pets, and vows to Mike that she now has a purpose in life.
_	However, the real world advent of various forms of personal protective materials like Kevlar and the realization that being shot while wearing such protection should still be avoided, has led to the costume being re-imagined with varying forms of bulletproof protection which employs the aforementioned use of the suit's chest symbol as a bull's-eye to lure shots at the armor's strongest point.
_	Reunited on a live stage, Jen rejects Jerry's proposal, telling him, "I think that you know I was so committed to this -- I hope that you know that -- and I really tried to make it work but I think we talked a lot and we saw each other and I think that we both came to the realization that we were better as friends."
_	These studies have led to the realization that the regulation of isoform sorting is extremely complex and highly regulated.
_	He proposed a new way of doing things – including the realization that politics was a profession - such that he became the first paid Chairman of Marion County Republican Central Committee in 1966, where he remained until 1970.
_	This in turn led to a shift in the village’s economic structure, one that became all the more obvious in 1955 when a technical stone factory – one in which stone is processed into useful articles – opened, as well as the realization that some 50 inhabitants were commuting to work every morning on postbuses to jobs that lay outside the village, mainly in Idar-Oberstein.
_	Amnesia: Reeling from the realization that his partnership with White was a lie, Black realizes that he doesn't know who he is and is suffering from amnesia.
_	Since the realization that syndromes such as Tourette Syndrome and OCD are caused by dysfunction of the non-motor loops of basal ganglia circuits, new treatments for these disorders, based on treatments originally designed to treat movement disorders are being developed.
_	I would say that my most interesting experience with the earlier techniques was the realization that when you make cut-ups you do not get simply random juxtapositions of words, that they do mean something, and often that these meanings refer to some future event.
_	But they don’t, so I’ve kind of come to the realization that I’m not going to be able to create film for my community based on support from my community, and it’s really heartbreaking."
_	Nakajima writes from the perspective of a woman coming to the realization that her feelings for a male friend have progressed beyond friendship, after "crying all night".
_	They came out with the realization that they are the only remaining persons that haven't been turned into zombies.
_	Pippin comes to the realization that the widow's home was the only place where he was truly happy ("Magic Shows and Miracles").
_	Additionally, many CFOs have made the realization that an operating environment that values cash, profit margins, and risk mitigation is one that plays to the primary skills and capabilities of a procurement organization, and become increasingly involved (directly via oversight or indirectly through improved collaboration) with the procurement function according to a recent research report that looks at the CFO's relationship with procurement.
_	Alexandra defies him, becoming irate at the realization that Chance's romantic interests in Heavenly are more important to him than her own needs.
_	With the development of better hydrophones, the transistor and miniaturization, and the realization that very low frequency sound was important, more effective acoustic sensors followed.
_	The field is rapidly evolving, with much new scholarship, often based on the realization that there is much about Chinese history that is unknown or controversial.
_	In addition to the realization that there are major gaps in our knowledge of Chinese history is the equal realization that there are tremendous quantities of primary source material that have not yet been analyzed.
_	The fact that there are no algorithms or ahistorical decision procedures to deal with these issues must not be a motive of despair (i.e. the Cartesian Anxiety), but rather a first step in the realization that, when it comes to human affairs, the type of reasoning appropriate to praxis is the ability to do justice to particular situations in their particularity.
_	The veteran comes to the realization that providing care to fellow human beings in need is the deepest experience that life can provide.
_	The story also deals with Alison Bechdel's own struggle with her sexual identity, reaching a catharsis in the realization that she is a lesbian and her coming out to her parents.
_	The brothers expect one day to take over the restaurant themselves, but one morning their father comes to the realization that he hates working there and he sells the restaurant without consulting the rest of the family.
_	Its greatest source of frustration, like that of every important poem, is the realization that it’s impossible for any of us to escape the set limits imposed on us by 'reality.'"
_	This has led to the realization that many gamma rays produced in astronomical processes result not from radioactive decay or particle annihilation, but rather in much the same manner as the production of X-rays.
_	After his conversion, he was mentored by several men from his home church in Wilmington, North Carolina and came to the realization that God had called him to ministry.
_	and into romance, heartbreak and the realization that happiness may lie in the home she left behind.
_	In 1910 he traveled around the world, visiting Kashmir, northern and central India, Assam, Burma, Java, and Japan, developing "the habit of never taking a ticket further than the next stop, and came to the realization that life is much too short to hurry."
_	This is in response to the realization that the Chinese navy is producing new weapons that can threaten carriers beyond the range their aircraft can strike them.
_	It started with the realization that excessive bleeding inevitably equaled death.
_	Byrd said that "the realization that rock was an access to a larger public came out of that concert, and the idea of forming a band began taking shape."
_	Psychologist Dr. Elliot Cohen of Leeds Metropolitan University and the UK Institute of Psychosomanautics defines psychonautics as "the means to study and explore consciousness (including the unconscious) and altered states of consciousness; it rests on the realization that to study consciousness is to transform it."
_	Horrified by the realization that she has killed and terrified by the prospect of legal repercussions, she confides in Indu and Gautham, who decide to take her to Kamarottu and create an alibi for Harini.
_	Between 1904 and 1909, Hine took over 200 plates (photographs) and came to the realization that documentary photography could be employed as a tool for social change and reform.
_	It was the finding of black carbon-rich shales in Cretaceous sediments that had accumulated on submarine volcanic plateaus (Shatsky Rise, Manihiki Plateau), coupled with the fact that they were identical in age with similar deposits cored from the Atlantic Ocean and known from outcrops in Europe - particularly in the geological record of the otherwise limestone-dominated Apennines chain in Italy - that led to the realization that these widespread similar strata recorded highly unusual oxygen-depleted conditions in the world ocean during several discrete periods of geological time.
_	As Dr. Eppes applies the Turing Test to a seemingly unique artificial intelligence, he is tricked only to come to the realization that the computer only uses a recursive algorithm to apply the most human responses, while simultaneously being tempted by an offer to work for DARPA.
_	The idea for the CPM began in the early 1970s at the University of Georgia with the realization that the state was experiencing explosive growth in information and knowledge, significant new social legislation, and rapidly altering social values.
_	This shift was engendered by the realization that communities can be strengthened by further developing national citizenship laws to benefit both the social and the economic state of a nation.
_	An analysis of the radiation dosages received by the crewmembers was found to be minor and led to the realization that sampling could be accomplished effectively with manned aircraft.
_	Reasons for the renewed interest in daylighting include the high cost of fossil fuels and the realization that sources of electricity have a finite life.
_	Selvo was motivated not only by his familial ties and the promise of reward, but also the realization that Norman control over the Strait of Otranto would be just as great of a threat to Venetian power in the region as it would be to their ally in the east.
_	The trauma of the transformation and the realization that she will no longer be able to bear children prove too great, however, and Haruka succumbs to blood loss and exposure.
_	Ted's efforts to get him a bottle (even if he is arrested for theft), but comes to the realization that Ted wants to start anew in Chicago to get away from Robin.
_	The GLF's statement of purpose clearly stated: "We are a revolutionary group of men and women formed with the realization that complete sexual liberation for all people cannot come about unless existing social institutions are abolished.
_	"But out of that came more sessions and more songs and the realization that I had to admit how hurt I was."
_	However, she leaves him after learning that he was the one responsible for the calamity in the first place and that his ships are bringing thousands of slaves from nearby planets, and comes to the realization that Arkon is a tyrant.
_	When children develop the realization that other people have different thoughts and beliefs other than their own, they are able to grow in their development of theory of mind as they begin to have better understandings of emotions.
_	"the realization that the cultural values of art and literature were being turned by capitalism into what I can only describe as spiritual onanism and the discovery that communism, by solving the material problems of society, was the only path to a future creative renaissance, was the first impulse."
_	Upon the realization that the songs in the "High School Musical" series appear disconnected from the plot, Parker found it easier to write fodder songs in one week.
_	After learning from him that Jess paid her way through school, Becky comes to the realization that her parents didn't teach her how to value money at a young age and thus she wounded up needing others to pay her debts.
_	By 2001, with the realization that Gunster could not be effectively renovated any further and was unable to adequately meet the needs of the University student body which had grown dramatically since its completion in 1960, the University initiated plans for a new student center, which culminated in the construction of the DeNaples Center in 2008.
_	According to Block a sign of Westlake's genius, and the key factor in the character's durability across the decades, was the realization that "[a] mellow Parker is no Parker at all."
_	He awakens in her the realization that she is the kind of woman who reduces men to cowering wimps but who cannot, perhaps somewhat paradoxically, put together a sound, completely fulfilling relationship.
_	The purpose of Deity yoga is to bring the meditator to the realization that the yidam or meditation deity and the practitioner are in essence the same, that they are non-dual ("advaya").
_	He comes to the realization that all of our actions are interconnected and that environmental degradation, species loss, ocean acidification, pollution, and scarcity of food and water are limiting, even reducing, the Earth's ability to support humans.
_	Also in the second season when, at one point, Lamb had Veronica in custody for a very serious charge of breaking and entering and was clearly looking forward to booking her for it, he came to the realization that to pursue it would serve the purposes of a pair of child abusers.
_	Cenva is also credited with the realization that hitting a Holtzman field with a lasgun beam results in a large and unpredictable explosion.
_	This caused the realization that humanity and Kherans were closely related and that similar species had been seeded throughout the universe, creating both the Daemonites and Kherans in addition to humans.
_	The reader is brought into Rank's world and exposed to his hurts, joys, and ultimately the realization that one must narrate their own lives and reject the labels others may try to give you.
_	Hope Clearwater, however, slowly comes to the realization that the chimps are up to no good as the two groups of chimpanzees she is studying come into lethal conflict.
_	He contemplates how he has always been a ridiculous person, and also, how recently, he has come to the realization that nothing much matters to him any more.
_	His first book in exile, "The Alien Bread" (1945), is full of small painful vignettes of daily experience where the smell of a flower, a bend in the river, or the pale light of the morning would deceive and comfort the traveler by their intimate familiarity — only to shock him afterwards with the realization that the flower was not known at home, the river bears some strange German name, and the morning promises another day of hard labor for alien masters.
_	Using both solvent composition and the realization that most desired components in biofuel generation possess a certain degree of hydrophobicity, LS9 has engineered their microbes to carry out their reactions in the aqueous-like phase, which is of lower hydrophobic character, and their desired components are secreted and float to the top forming a hydrophobic phase.
_	During this time, Doug came to the realization that he might never have another child to raise along with Hope.
_	Although the audience may feel cheated at the end of the movie, they are still left with the realization that there is a logical possibility someone else could have faced a similar tragic predicament.
_	In January 1945 BuShips revised its paint formulations due to a shortage of blue pigment, and the realization that tone was far more important than hue in camouflage effect, eliminating the blue-purple shades which had characterized nearly all Navy ship colors whether called "blue" or "gray."
_	Horrified at the realization that he turned her down for a date, he uploads her altered photo to the Internet, and is about to ask her out when he discovers that she and Clyde Donovan are now dating.
_	Observations in 1969 led to the realization that certain types of major sunspot breakouts were preceded by a particular type of radio signal, which allowed advanced prediction of upcoming solar storms.
_	After retiring as a footballer, Dicks took up golf and soon turned professional, but was forced to give this career up due to his knee injury and the realization that he did not have the ability to win tournaments.
_	It works, and the realization that she can use her gift to inspire people motivates her to take up surfing again.
_	After dealing with Lore, Data also confronts the realization that his "mother" is still alive ().
_	The viewer experiences the victim's point of view, "hearing" his thoughts and feelings as they run from shock to anger to frustration to the realization that he may be put in his grave alive.
_	In addition, Buchman described Webber's retirement as an attempt to reconcile with his estranged wife, but leads to emotional devastation at the realization that she had moved on with a different man.
_	The "First Chronicles" sees the reality of the Land eventually 'proven' to Covenant; another interpretation of Covenant's eventual decision to aid the Land is the realization that, whether the Land is real or not, it matters to him.
_	The illumination of the truth brings with it the realization that war is a game of strategy fought between generals, and soldiers are unwitting participants.
_	As the camp is set upon, first by political interests and then by big capital, Swearengen comes to the realization that the preservation of his own interests depends on collaboration with others in the camp.
_	Upon his death, and with the realization that performance opportunities weren't what they had been earlier in her and her husband's careers, she purchased the barge that would later become Bargemusic in response to a need for intimate performance spaces, performance options outside of Manhattan and reliable work for artists at a good pay.
_	We may be rudely awakened some morning with the realization that we are the hapless and unwilling guardians of the propaganda of a fascist ‘’regime’’.”
_	Skye was devastated by Alan's death, and the realization that Lorenzo had lied to her and also that he did not fully trust her.
_	She deals with some significant trauma over the years: the death of her fiancé, the death of her best friend, the realization that her mother was a former KGB spy, the estrangement of many of her friends and the constant activity and changes that she must endure from being a spy on a regular basis.
_	There were just kind of, not necessarily bad vibes, but we came to the realization that we can't do it full-time.
_	The idea to collect and distribute power banks was born from the realization that the main problem was the lack of communication owing to the loss of electricity.
_	What is crucial here is the realization that what makes human experience universally possible to begin with without exception, is the perceiving mind.
_	It was just—you come to the realization that maybe the way you've been doing things is not the proper way and you have to regroup, not only on the court but off the court.
_	She turns him in, then she has to live with the guilt and the realization that she's betrayed the one thing that gave her life meaning.
_	Ghinsberg spent four days traveling upriver in order to find Gale and finally came to the realization that he was stranded alone in the jungle, despite believing it to be the adventure he wanted at first.
_	After being asked to locate a missing Carol and becoming a part of the Kingdom, Morgan finally comes to the realization that you have to kill sometimes, and kills Richard in a rage.
_	Upon the realization that his duplicate's death would mean his death in the future, Flashback fell to his knees in shock while Jeffries dealt with the remaining Omegans and destroyed Courtney.
_	He also came to the realization that slow light methods can be used to obtain enormous enhancements in the resolution of interferometric spectrometers, and he is currently working on the development of spectrometers based on this principle.
_	While she is struggling to keep him from calling the authorities, Valerie comes to the realization that Mac is the one she truly loves.
_	"When the reign of "katharevousa" came to an end in 1976, many Greeks felt, in their everyday lives, a kind of linguistic liberation and a greater sense of personal and national self-respect at the realization that the language they had imbibed with their mothers' milk was not only something to be cherished but something to be proud of ..."
_	America's increasing ethnic diversity, urbanization, and geographic redistribution made influential political leaders come to the realization that New Hampshire and Iowa were not representative of the United States.
_	He later revives his music career as a session guitarist, only to be discouraged by the realization that he is playing others' music and stifling his own creativity.
_	Matteo is a 17-year-old boy who comes to the realization that he is in love with Don Massimo, a young priest of the village that leads the marching band in which Matteo plays the drum.
_	Regarding biofuels from foodstuffs, the realization that converting the entire grain harvest of the US would only produce 16% of its auto fuel needs, and the decimation of Brazil's absorbing tropical rain forests to make way for biofuel production has made it clear that placing energy markets in competition with food markets results in higher food prices and insignificant or negative impact on energy issues such as global warming or dependence on foreign energy.
_	With the realization that the XFV's top speeds would be eclipsed by contemporary fighters and that only highly experienced pilots could fly the aircraft, the project was cancelled in June 1955.
_	Despite her professionalism in front of her subordinates she has also at times displayed genuine sympathy and concern for the well-being of the team, and was visibly concerned by the realization that Shaw's knowledge of Sarah killing his wife placed Sarah in danger.
_	Then, the animals come to the realization that they have been given the gift of speech to tell the world of the "miracle"--the birth of Christ.
_	It is through the realization that one is the sole being responsible for rendering life meaningful that values are actualized and life becomes meaningful.
_	He expected, however, that individuals would come to the realization that the "occupancy and use" was a "generally trustworthy guiding principle of action," and that individuals would likely contract to an occupancy and use policy.
_	Odo then comes to the realization that the only people that can help him are his own people, the Founders.
_	Each character in the L.A. Dollhouse is forced to confront their own moral complicity in an increasingly downward spiral from moral grey areas to the realization that what the Dollhouse is doing is ultimately immoral and extremely dangerous.
_	In time, he came to the realization that he would not adhere to any one denomination, but develop a faith of his own by combining aspects of several different religions.
_	When he was in college, he came to the realization that there were no movies made in Swahili.
_	Over time, the curriculum of Master of Public Policy and the Master of Public Administration (M.P.A.) degrees have blended and converged, due to the realization that policy analysis and program evaluation could benefit from an understanding of public administration, and vice versa.
_	Dr. Eastmann comes to the realization that Harry had clearly died of fright (possibly from the result of a heart attack), when Harry (who is now reduced to bones and skin) is taken.
_	Qi then suggested to Sima Wei to take the opportunity to massacre Empress Jia's relatives and take over the government himself, but Sima Wei hesitated— at the same time, Empress Jia came to the realization that if the murders of Sima Liang and Wei could be traced to her instigation, that would bring a political firestorm' also that Sima Wei could not be easily controlled.
_	His death prompted the realization that the "Camelot era" was truly over.
_	After arriving at the University of Cape Town (UCT) with the intention of studying theology, he came to the realization that he had no future at scrum-half and subsequently switched to number 8.
_	However, more recent scientific studies have indicated "Morelia amesthistina's" lack of mobility between habitats, leading to the realization that this type of snake is "more prone to speciation than other pythons."
_	This work led to the realization that on any wing of finite length, wing-tip effects became very important to the overall performance and characterization of the wing.
_	While some Bábís had come to the realization that Bahá'u'lláh was claiming to be the Promised One through the many remarks and allusions that he had made during his final few months in Baghdad, it appears that most other Bábís were unaware of Bahá'u'lláh's claim until a few years later while he was in Edirne.
_	Zamir, still reeling from the realization that his father is still alive, is off his game and leads the whole Gang around a blind corner and into Habu's waiting trap.
_	With the realization that the young adults at Tamana have to be equipped with skills to adapt appropriately to the needs of adulthood and thereby function as an independent whole,physically and emotionally, Nai Disha was conceived.
_	Time-sharing was developed in the late 1950s out of the realization that a single expensive computer could be efficiently utilized if a multitasking, multiprogramming operating system allowed multiple users simultaneous interactive access.
_	At twenty-four, she was the epitome of youthful sensuality and worldliness- with her, every moment Ian spent was filled with excitement and spontaneity, along with the realization that this was the life he's always wanted.
_	The Siddhi that she provides is the realization that only she exists.
_	Zico came to the realization that he had made a mistake thinking Sara was the chosen Shard Caster of Amil Gaoul.
_	Financial difficulties encountered by several Welsh clubs, most notably by neighbours and great rivals Neath who went bust on at least two occasion (only to be "bailed out" by the WRU and a team of local businessmen), served only to reinforce this cautious approach until the realization that in such circumstances club committee members may find themselves liable for uncleared debts.
_	The readers’ astounding response and interest in Marley sparked Grogan's decision to write a book, due to the realization that he had “a bigger story to tell” and “owed it to Marley to tell the rest of the story.
_	Snider's competitive fires were stoked by the realization that the chance to play the Soviets represented a chance to prove that his squad was the best team in the world and much more than a "goon squad."
_	Michael Rapino said: "Ticket sales have not been what we anticipated and we came to the realization that we had bit off more than we could chew.
_	The reason was not only to stimulate greater responsibility on the part of companies, but also the realization that decisions were sometimes better taken locally.
_	Despite, the long-term issues of McCurdy's proposals, at the state level the short-term benefits are replaced by the realization that natural gas is not only an alternative solution to foreign oil but can also contribute to the creation of thousands of jobs.
_	Kennedy has said that the album "touches on the thoughts and emotions of someone who has come to question everything that was once regarded as an absolute truth" and that it is about "the realization that everything you once believed in might not exist."
_	"I've come to the realization that I have tried to do too much by handling the accounting side of my campaign finance reporting", Hartsell said in the January 15, 2013 article.
_	These intolerable issues became too visible to ignore therefore its repercussions were feared greatly, the realization that we as individuals take the responsibility for encounter and resolution in our lives issues was an emerging idealism of the 1960s.
_	Roitman states (without references) that the realization that the axiom of regularity is equivalent to the equality of the universe of ZF sets to the cumulative hierarchy is due to von Neumann.
_	This shift in nomenclature reaches back to the 1960s and has been the source of much debate in the scientific community, which was triggered by the adoption of the unified atomic mass unit and the realization that weight was in some ways an inappropriate term.
_	Shocked at the realization that Mark fell because of her, Olwen tries to enjoy playing with her favourite pet, a dragon-like native animal called Hobbit, when Hobbit is shot by hunting settlers.
_	Rev. Perry's empathy for the inconsolable Valdez stirred him to the realization that he should form "a church for all of us who are outcasts".
_	All of these actions are culminating to the formation of spatial maps in the brain and the realization that "Hey, that thing that's moving this object is actually a part of me."
_	When his efforts seemed to have little effect, he came to the realization that everything depended on God, and that one should attempt to live in accordance with the will of God without concern for success or failure.
_	"After" signified the realization that gay men knew most or all of their friends were infected with AIDS, and the syndrome became pervasive throughout the media.
_	The story Mary told her about road trips in the family's old Mustang led her to the realization that a car she had seen in the classifieds of the newspaper—which she was searching due to her father's habit of leaving her coded messages in such a manner—was indeed left behind by Stephen as she suspected.
_	The scholar Heinrich Dumoulin describes the first rank as the realization that "all diverse things and events are in their essence the same, formless and empty.
_	Following the aftermath, the Lamplighter was given to Mallory to kill, as a peace gesture from the Seven; Butcher was left angry at him at the realization that the colonel never intended to let him kill the Homelander.
_	This problem was eventually solved by the realization that the 6-pounder could be bored out to 75 mm and fire unmodified US ammunition.
_	One aspect of the invention lay in the realization that a relatively small motor, driven with higher voltage and current than would be feasible for continuous operation, could deliver enough power to crank the engine for starting.
_	Following the realization that "Pneumocystis" from humans could not infect experimental animals such as rats, and that the rat form of "Pneumocystis" differed physiologically and had different antigenic properties, Frenkel was the first to recognize the human pathogen as a distinct species.
_	Syrian elites were united in the realization that they were about to lose everything.
_	In giving this opinion, Tchaikovsky showed an implicit confidence in his own music, and the realization that it compared favorably to any number of their compositions.
_	Upon the realization that Bandler and Grinder were developing innovations in areas where Northwestern University had not yet "cracked the code," Faulkner began NLP training.
_	Env protein in the plasma of multiple sclerosis patients and the realization that is a member of the HERV-W family, the questions of how HERV-W was related to Multiple sclerosis and what caused transcription of HERV-W were investigated.
_	Local citizens who for years enjoyed unobstructed mountain views and unfettered recreation within the mountain range increasingly came to the realization that the mountains were unprotected.
_	Piller suggested that the "Enterprise" crew would immediately undergo a transformation due to the presence of the older "Enterprise", and that Guinan would be integral to the realization that something was wrong.
_	He says he was initially inspired in 2005 by the realization that many American middle and high schools now have police patrolling hallways and classrooms.
_	Hilferty worked with the Jesuit Volunteer Corps in a volunteer program improving city playgrounds in Portland, Oregon and came to the realization that he "was a pretty good leader" based on his ability to accomplish his goals by managing his resources and connecting with government officials.
_	In 1959, observations in the microwave part of the electromagnetic (EM) spectrum (0.1–10 GHz) led to the discovery of the Jovian decimetric radiation (DIM) and the realization that it was synchrotron radiation emitted by relativistic electrons trapped in the planet's radiation belts.
_	Upon the realization that other artists were exploring similar boundaries, she sought further inspiration and investigation into history.
_	"Hi" is "about trying to find beauty and company in the realization that life, for the most part in incredibly difficult and that pretending otherwise only adds disappointment to hardship," while "Born to Suffer" is "about the potential for relief in ending one's own life, even just the thought of it, being mortified by life and about the earthquake in Haiti."
_	Veronica rushes to the hospital as the ghosts of Kurt, Ram, and Heather Chandler taunt her with the realization that she has become as awful as Chandler ("Yo Girl").
_	In the prologue of the book, Holiday explains how finding early successes led him to the realization that ego can cloud ambition and hinder personal and professional growth, particularly when accomplishments are tied to self-worth.
_	Throughout the video clip, Santana is seen going to nightclubs and parties, hanging out with attractive women, when all of a sudden they mysteriously leave him and his friends after the sound of a whistle, only to later discover that all the girls he was with ended up being around this nephew, from him blowing the whistle, Santana comes to the realization that the whistle he gave his nephew had the ability to attract any girl who was within the radius of the sound.
_	"Their frustration came out of the realization that in ten short years the Movement had become, like all elements of the Establishment, a preserver of the past and that they were no longer innovators."
_	However, the realization that the .30-06 Springfield cartridge was too long for the prototype gun's mechanism to easily and reliably work with resulted in the discarding of the project.
_	However, Nick only went back to Eve in an effort to help Mindy because Nick himself had come to the realization that Eve was obsessed with Mindy and needed help.
_	It wasn't until the end of her college career that Zuluaga came to the realization that she wanted to be a storyteller.
_	The board attributed its 3-2 rejection of the Environmental Impact Report to the realization that “the project would degrade pristine desert land with little benefit to area residents.”
_	Morgan quickly comes to the realization that Rick is a living human and aids him back to health.
_	Even before Victor began his attacks, the man was extremely respectful merely at the realization that he was speaking with Victor Kiriakis, and very frightened and apologetic when he realized that he may have harassed his son.
_	Back at work, Daniel and Amanda briefly talk about what happened at the resort, coming to the realization that there is no baggage between them despite their fling, leaving them in a mutually beneficial place emotionally.
_	Speaking to Susie's doctors, a month after she entered Butler, Lovecraft came to the realization that she was never going to be released.
_	The antinomy of theory and fact is the conflict between, on the one hand, the realization that all understanding of facts is mediated by theory, and on the other hand, the belief in an independent comparison of theory and fact.
_	Eventually, Mrs. Tillerman comes to the realization that besides caring deeply for the four children, she can and will offer them a permanent home, despite the emotional and financial fears she has.
_	expresses that “community policing measures in the realization that informal social control exercised through everyday relationships and institutions is more effective than legal sanctions”.
_	Yoritomo becomes extremely injured, and afterwards reveals why he chose the path of Mashogane; as he watched his brother battle, he came to the realization that the Genji needed a strong leader, and eventually the day would come where Yoshitsune would replace Yoritomo as the leader.
_	The origin of Raphael's anger is not always fully explored, but in some incarnations appears to stem partly from the realization that they are the only creatures of their kind and ultimately alone.
_	After being freaked out by Victoria she came back with the realization that music is about talking to people not money which wins Peyton over.
_	"A", in the body of home-schooled boy George, talks about growing up to the realization that they are different from everyone else.
_	This led to the realization that communication might not always be "honest" (indeed, there are some obvious examples where it is not, as in mimicry).
_	This comes also with the realization that rock and roll is "music", not literature, and that the music is the most important aspect of it.
_	But the realization that trains of electromagnetic waves could produce some pressure, in combination with the penetrating power of Röntgen rays (now called x-rays), led him to conclude that nothing argues against the possible existence of even more penetrating radiation than x-rays, which could replace Le Sage's particles.
_	By the time of his discharge, he had come to the realization that aviation was something he wanted to do for the rest of his life.
_	The impetus behind the research into sweeping jet actuators lies in the realization that any vertical tail structure on an aircraft is a parasitic surface in level flight.
_	The Defenders now have the key and the realization that their enemies are divided.
_	Actually, by 1:00 pm Napoleon finally came to the realization that he was desperately outnumbered and needed to get his army out of danger.
_	FBI special agent Dale Cooper (Kyle MacLachlan) has been sent to the town to investigate and has come to the realization that the killer was Laura's father, Leland Palmer (Ray Wise), who acted while possessed by a demonic entity, Killer BOB (Frank Silva).
_	In the second stage, the dreamer is instructed to overcome all fear of the contents of the dream so there is the realization that nothing in the dream can cause harm.
_	When Sergeant Deadhead returns home he is a national hero but has also developed a massive ego due to space travel causing his personality to blend with that of the chimpanzee, and the realization that he has become a media sensation.
_	She also comes to the realization that shopping for unnecessary items can be boring as well, but has never admitted it until now.
_	Historically, only parents could sue for their "own" damages incurred as a result of the birth of a disabled child (e.g., the mother's own pregnancy medical bills and cost of psychiatric treatment for both parents' emotional distress resulting from the realization that their child was disabled).
_	Upon the realization that it would also be too costly to commission a song, Remo sought a song in the style of the 1980s by an unsigned, independent artist, leading to the use of "Push Play".
_	It gained popularity in the United States, Japan and other countries after the 1980s with the realization that students need a broader exposure to the world as globalization proceeds.
_	In 2008, Geoff Ramsey's interest in gaming achievements resulted in the realization that no community-based website related to achievements existed.
_	The shock of Book's death, and the realization that he can't hide without endangering everyone he meets, leads Mal to stop running.
_	These sojourns brought her to the realization that America is in need of a new cosmology that includes the experience of all its people.
_	This led to the realization that there are even more galaxies than previously thought.
_	"This book was conceived in the realization that my long illness with a disease of the spinal cord has been a kind of extended anthropological field trip, for through it I have sojourned in a social world no less strange to me at first than those of the Amazon forests.
_	Leni begins to talk about the two prisoners Franz allowed Heinrich to kill, and Johanna comes to the realization that Franz had many people tortured and killed.
_	In 1958, the realization that ELF waves could penetrate seawater led U.S. physicist Nicholas Christofilos to suggest that the U.S. Navy use them to communicate with submarines.
_	However, her wish was not granted when she soon came to the realization that Will and Gwen were on the verge of getting back together.
_	Will was crestfallen, and came to the realization that the second time he hooked up with Jade Taylor he impregnated her.
_	She finished the song by including in the song "every catch phrase you possibly could imagine", before laughing at the realization that she had written a potential hit single and her first dance song.
_	Young blacks of the 1970s, who were being alienated from identifying as British, emerged from this deep crisis of identity by coming to the realization that the complex things that made them black could never be traded away.
_	"The 100th episode of The Vampire Diaries was packed with emotions — from the sheer joy of seeing old faces return, to the excitement of scandalous new hookups, and the utter shock at the realization that some people, especially Katherine, never change.
_	Perhaps most disconcerting for the party was the realization that after two decades of denouncing clerics and clerical meddling in politics ("clerico-fascism"), 28 percent of those surveyed thought the clergy should have a public and political role.
_	This experience led Professor Raskin to the realization that high school students, especially urban students, are not taught about the Constitution and how it affects their daily lives.
_	Shortly after, McCormick awakens to the realization that it is now 1992.
_	Later in the series, Jeanie and Peter actually became somewhat close, with Jeanie helping Peter cope with the realization that his son Reese was deaf.
_	The poem describes feelings of loss and the realization that there is something beyond the cycle of life and death.
_	"There She Goes" is about how the realization that "things change, but we’re still the same boys no matter how far we go from home."
_	After Simon and Binabik have their reunion, they come to the realization that Memory - one of the three Great Swords recognized as being key to defeating the Storm King - is one and the same with Bright-Nail, old King John’s sword that was buried with him not three years previously.
_	Randy and Sharon come to the realization that if they just keep lying to him, he might not ever trust them again; Randy finally apologizes to Stan and gives him the whole truth about drug abuse, saying that it probably won't kill him or fund terrorism but still may ruin his future.
_	They battle hunger, parasites and the realization that there are no easy answers.
_	First believing it to be a prank, King later comes to the realization that his Matrix project has evolved into a responsive Artificial Intelligence.
_	Nygma announces to Cobblepot that he plans on resigning and that they could continue working as partners but Cobblepot reveals his romantic feelings, giving Nygma the realization that Cobblepot indeed killed Isabella.
_	Hank becomes visibly shocked, implying that he has at last come to the realization that Walt is Heisenberg.
_	Writing for "Newsday", John Anderson commented that "'Stay Alive' spends a lot of time inside the video game system, and what will terrify the audience very early on is the realization that there's better acting in the video game than on the big screen."
_	He gets Mike to keep Samantha busy during his date with Jamie, but the realization that Jamie's platonic friendship is important to him hampers Chris's plan.
_	As the lyrics grind on describing the prior engagements with the female antagonist Taft brings us quite suddenly to the realization that the gold fish is dead, the family dog blurs away and the baby ceases to move and recedes to a cold blackened shape.
_	The successive disproving of Ross's theories, combined with an intuitive knowledge of their condition, brings Mason and Carter to the realization that they already crashed and are dead.
_	"Gutman's insights into the strengths of working-class resistance to industrial capitalism and the realization that one source of this resistance lay in traditions and ideas derived from previous forms of social organization made Thompson's emphasis on culture and the 'making' of the working class particularly attractive."
_	As a potentially valuable by-product, McDaniel's firearms-training programs provided results capable of shocking the society into the realization that it still knew very little about the potential capabilities of human performance, and how to train people to outstandingly perform the fine motor-skills that are of critical importance in our machine-dominated society.
_	On the run, he stumbles upon Veeran and his accomplice discussing a plot to bomb a school bus, and comes to the realization that Veeran is the culprit.
_	Over the next few pages, he is faced with flashing lights, disembodied voices, a cathedral, teddy bears nailed to wooden posts, graveyards, the realization that he is both alone and that his world is impossibly small, and terrifying creatures known as Nightgaunts, before meeting with Jasmine, a 'human' who identifies him as Halloween.
_	We see Brenda's youthful heartbreak and the realization that love doesn't conquer all.
_	First, leaders deny of the importance of the emerging market, then leaders have the realization that the top earners from this new market may be interested in the products the company develops for other, more established, markets.
_	Kahn is injured in the explosion, but Dax rigs a force field across a plasma fire that allows her to reach Kahn, coming to the realization that the relationship is worth exile.
_	Due to the realization that many of the loans backing these bonds were of a low quality, credit ratings declined sharply.
_	At first enthralled, he eventually becomes disillusioned as he comes to the realization that he is in love with Léna.
_	Academics are coming to the realization that this time is different and that those losses appear permanent and cannot be regained.”
_	A few days later, however, the realization that the pool of point guards in the 2012 draft was shallow and Burke's stock was high led to some deliberation for him and his family:
_	It’s an album of big adult themes: the weight of responsibility, the realization that romantic infatuation is fleeting and probably bullshit, the power of fidelity and loyalty to outlast momentary sensation and passion."
_	Compounding his situation is the realization that the unbridled violence practiced by the students may be the result of demonic possession.
_	During the brief engagement, a horrified Corky comes to the realization that she will now be "Corky Sherwood-Forrest".
_	Gradually his whole mind became gripped by the realization that his purpose in life was to attain nirvana by becoming a Yogi.
_	Structuralism is defined as a theory resting on the realization that if human actions or productions have meaning there must be an underlying system that makes this meaning possible, since an utterance has meaning only in the context of a preexistent system of rules and conventions.
_	Ugyen Wangchuck's emergence as the national leader coincided with the realization that the dual political system was obsolete and ineffective.
_	In 1966, she read an article her mother had written for "El Universal" entitled 'Yo, sí soy feminista' (I, yes I, am a feminist) and came to the realization that feminism was not about being "against men, but against the oppressive and discriminatory system(s) that makes all women inferior beings to all men".
_	He comes to the realization that up until now he has been a hermit, hiding from his conflictions.
_	Sonny later informs Paul that Tori is hiding the truth about his paternity and Paul confronts her at Sonny's club where he and John come to the realization that they are father and son.
_	During a banal portrait shoot he came to the realization that what he was looking at seemed to be more interesting to him through his lens than in reality.
_	She agreed to audition after being encouraged by her mother to do so and became comfortable with the idea of performing upon the realization that Friedman had a different idea for how Terminators would be portrayed on the show.
_	According to Bernard Perusse from "The Gazette", the album is full of big dramatic emotion with various themes in the songs: longing for a departed father, the cruelty of love, the healing power of tears, the waning days of an aging mother, the emotional consolation sought by a single parent, the loss of a lover to war, the realization that a long-standing relationship is dead, the misery of a baby's death and the romantic upheaval of a serious fight.
_	“Asteroid Day and the 100X Declaration are ways for the public to contribute to an awareness of the Earth’s vulnerability and the realization that Asteroids hit Earth all the time.”
_	She finally comes to the realization that she and Todd weren't going to make it work a long time ago, but was too much of a "commitment control freak" to admit it to herself.
_	Observation that pendulum clocks slowed down in summer brought the realization that thermal expansion and contraction of the pendulum rod with changes in temperature was a source of error.
_	While studying in that tradition, he supposedly came to the realization that any attempt to teach Buddhism through the study of words could not succeed.
_	This led to the introduction of the coherent state as a quantum description of laser light and the realization that some states of light could not be described with classical waves.
_	Becky also comes to the realization that going shopping for unnecessary items can be boring, but she had never been able admit it.
_	This leads him to the realization that the mysterious woman on the phone was actually his wife.
_	Double-lens cameras were first developed around 1870, due to the realization that having a second lens alongside the taking lens would mean that one could focus without having to keep swapping the ground glass screen for the plate, reducing the time required for taking a picture.
_	"October Sky" does not illustrate good parenting; rather, it evokes the realization that since parents have only a limited vision of how to shape their children's future, the job requires a huge amount of love and a lot of divine assistance."
_	This event inspired the realization that a hydraulic pump could be used to lift heavy objects and, as long as they were supported by something slippery, the heavy objects could be easily moved.
_	The development of the modern desktop replacement computer came with the realization that many laptops were used in a semi-permanent location, often remaining connected to an external power source at all times.
_	A new area of pre-testing driven by the realization that what works on TV does not necessarily translate in other media.
_	Shortly before voting for the third ballot was completed, with the realization that there was a Dion-Kennedy pact, Ignatieff campaign co-chair Denis Coderre made an appeal to Bob Rae to join forces and prevent Dion from winning the Liberal Party leadership (on the basis that Stephane Dion's ardent federalism would alienate Quebecers), but Rae turned down the offer and opted to release his delegates.
_	The state board of education came to the realization that such teachers were of no supply.
_	Asuka comes to the realization that her entire being is caught up in being a competent Eva pilot and that without it, she has no personal identity: "I'm the junk…
_	Enraged at the realization that the Animorphs survived his trap, Tom orders the Blade ship's weapons to be targeted at the Pool ship's bridge.
_	With the Allies' air superiority increasing, the bombing of Rabaul and Wewak brought the realization that the invasion of New Britain was imminent.
_	Following the bombing and the realization that insurgents could deliver weapons of enormous yield with an ordinary truck or van, the presence of protective barriers (bollards) became common around critical government facilities in the United States and elsewhere, particularly Western civic targets situated overseas.
_	Lynn believes Hemingway likely was terrified Hadley would not survive the birth, and he became "beside himself with fear ... about the extent of her suffering and swamped by a sense of helplessness at the realization that he would probably arrive too late to be of assistance to her".
_	This would act twofold, both by giving a more controlled and monitored way of ending a life, but also to reduce the number of people who take their own lives after the realization that they may end up in a position like Seales, with an impending loss of autonomy and dignity.
_	Melissa N. Hayes-Gehrke of the University of Maryland found it "a nearly classic TOS plot, with god-like aliens, beings made only of energy, promises of advanced technology, and the realization that god-like powers are absolutely corrupting".
_	In the past fifty years, The Known Lands have been shocked with the realization that below their islands exists a subterranean world at least as large as their own – the Underdark.
_	All three apprentices are shocked at the realization that Saga can see them, since humans are not supposed to be able to see season fairies.
_	During the ensuing battle, Aphrodite comes to the realization that she hasn't felt love in centuries, since the Trojan War.
_	It's true that we can't get enough nuggets of Winchester childhood trauma, and the realization that was a nauseating cross between Here Comes Honey Boo Boo, Doomsday Preppers, and Ghost Adventures (or, as I like to call it, Ghost Hunting for Brahs) is both heartbreaking and hilarious, but Sam and Dean's strolls down memory lane have been done before—and done better—with enough frequency that not even our favorite form of filler could save this... this this."
_	It followed the realization that not only muscle, but also non-muscle cells, contained high concentrations of actin, albeit in part in an unpolymerized form.
_	In that essay, she related how she came to the realization that for some years, walking around a bookstore inevitably made her want to go to the restroom.
_	More recently, the dependence on text for archaeological descriptions has yielded to the realization that archaeological excavations by the People's Republic of China provides better evidence of Chinese daily life and ceremonies from the Neolithic times to the more recent centuries.
_	Katelyn Gadd, programmer of "Grim Fandango Remastered" and "Escape Goat 2", called the fight the most powerful experience she ever had in a video game, due to the realization that she was the intruder and she wanted to let the boss live, even though the game mechanics did not allow it.
_	It was the realization that Brant had committed murder, and that Brant had found Toth through him, which was causing Tom's anguish before his death.
_	(i.e. a certain concrete realization of a Hilbert space and associated operators reproducing the correct loop algebra – the realization that everybody was using) have been given by two groups (Lewandowski, Okolow, Sahlmann and Thiemann; and Christian Fleischhack).
_	In mahāyoga, one comes to the realization that actually all of our everyday experience is a visualization.
_	The design studios name relates to a neologism from the Dictionary of Obscure Sorrows and defined as; "n" "the realization that each random passerby is living a life as vivid and complex as your own."
_	La Jolla Academy of Advertising Arts (LJAAA) later known as The Advertising Arts College (TAAC), created a new school based on the realization that most traditional college advertising or design graduates were not prepared to go to work.
_	Little Bear is confused as to why a spirit would be frightened at the sight of death, coming to the realization that Omri really "is" a child.
_	Namkhai Norbu gives advice, that the realization that the life is only a big dream can help us finally liberate ourselves from the chains of emotions, attachments, and ego and then we have the possibility of ultimately becoming enlightened.
_	Even at the age of 24, he wrote to Harold Preece, "I am haunted by the realization that my best days, mental and physical, lie behind me."
_	The god at first cared for Brutha only because Om's own survival depended on Brutha's belief, but eventually grew to the realization that individual people are worth fighting for and agreed with Brutha that there would be no commandments unless Om adhered to them as well.
_	Dawn is appalled at the realization that the terrible Clara
_	The Zentraedi's increased exposure to human emotions and the realization that the human way of life may just be more enjoyable causes a wave of mutinies to spread through the Zentraedi fleet as soldiers refuse to fight and turn against their superiors.
_	A few years later, he had come to the realization that farming was not an efficient means of business for him; his farm had been situated in an area that was so far removed from a town that travel to deliver his products had been cumbersome.
_	In doing so, he inadvertently shows signs of his anger management problems and abusive personality, which he has been attempting to repress as a result of the realization that he raped her.
_	The name SevenMeters derived from the realization that the water level will rise 7 meters if the global warming will melt all the ice in Greenland.
_	Bush and Silverstone meet, travel to the Cryptozoic with a few allies, and decide together to usher in a new era of humanity, one enlightened by the realization that time flows backward.
_	This situation is exacerbated by the realization that Soviet forces in Ukraine are slowly making their way toward Poland as well.
_	During Tom's absence, his sons Hal, Ben, Matt and Maggie lead an initial search team to try to locate Anne and Alexis, but later return home to Charleston under the realization that the Espheni have them, and that the best course of action as suggested by Ben was to try and use the Rebel Skitters within the Espheni ranks to try to locate Anne and the baby.
_	In the human brain, the significance of the connectome stems from the realization that the structure and function of the human brain are intricately linked, through multiple levels and modes of brain connectivity.
_	Additionally Oort is responsible for a number of important insights about comets, including the realization that their orbits "implied there was a lot more solar system than the region occupied by the planets."
_	Salvation therefore is described as the realization that all finite reality is essentially dependent on the Supreme.
_	After coming to the realization that he will have custody of Geronimo for a while, he calls Relle to confirm if she is serious about the lodge; she responds that she is.
_	Modern production only began, however, with the realization that both the "Tremella" and its host species needed to be inoculated into the substrate to ensure success.
_	Its lyrical content mains focuses on a woman's realization and anger towards her ex-lover's, with its chorus centering on the realization that it won't take an intelligence like Albert Einstein's to figure out his feeble-mindedness, using a faux-formula phrase "Dumb + dumb = you."
_	State channels come from the realization that, for most purposes, only the actors involved in a smart contract are required to know about it.
_	The Mutare Exchange, also opened in 1896, thrived on the success of local mining, but with the realization that deposits in the area were not extensive, activity declined and it closed in 1924.
_	According to Mohamed Adan, chief of the local Adado administration, municipal officials were successful in persuading Hassan and other pirate commanders to disarm, as the bosses had come to the realization that they could no longer function with impunity and profits had dropped.
_	When Don persists, Rachel comes to the realization that he does not want to run away with her; he just wants to run away.
_	After spending time with Amanda he also comes to the realization that he could and has fallen in love again.
_	What starts out as a disappointment changes into the realization that the show has galvanized the once-sleepy town, making it lively and spirited.
_	After years of struggling to forge her own path while trying to meet everyone else's expectations, she had the realization that she had the power to heal herself . . . and that there are miracles in the Universe that she had never even imagined.
_	In the face of his captives' unshakable resolve and the realization that the Japanese are doomed to destruction, the sadistic General Mitsubi ultimately chooses to shoot himself.
_	The I Live Here foundation began following the realization that more needed to be done in addition to the book project.
_	Following the failure of Operation Market Garden, the full strategic significance of Antwerp dawned upon the Allies, with the realization that a huge mine clearance operation was needed in the Scheldt estuary in order to open it up.
_	Eventually, he comes to the realization that he and his female-companion are just alike; Hence, the title of the song, "Just Like Me".
_	The goal of Shingon is the realization that one's nature is identical with Mahavairocana, a goal that is achieved through initiation, meditation and esoteric ritual practices.
_	The defensive turret on bombers fell from favour with the realization that bombers could not attempt heavily defended targets without escort regardless of their defensive armament unless very high loss rates were acceptable, and the performance penalty from the weight and drag of turrets reduced speed, range and payload and increased the number of crew required.
_	They slowly come to the realization that her death did not occur the way they thought it did.
_	Davies's key insight came in the realization that computer network traffic was inherently "bursty" with periods of silence, compared with relatively-constant telephone traffic.
_	There is mass uproar in Japan after the sightings of the Red Dragon some days ago and Hajime finds himself coming to the realization that the secret that he and his brothers harbor won't be a secret for much longer.
_	During the night Petter dawns on the realization that Beate must have heard the same stories from her mother, Maria, thereby making him Beate's father.
_	This research, combined with the new understanding of Mendelian inheritance, evolved from an investigation of a few families with an obscure and not very dangerous disease (alkaptonuria) to the realization that a whole territory of mysterious diseases might be understood as inherited disorders of metabolism.
_	He gets kicked off the train and finds himself in the city of Deedstown, where he unintentionally scares a bunch of the town's citizens, which leads him to the realization that he is a ghost.
_	Foundas ended his review noting "nothing in "Vantage Point" quickens the pulse as much as the realization that, with each successive turn of the wheel, we come one step closer to the end."
_	His work in basic science has had an impact in the study of cancer, including the realization that eIF4E over expression is prominent in many cancers, and has suggested its utility as a tumor marker.
_	What integral awareness notices is that though we may utilize categorical thinking for various purposes, we also have the realization that time is an indivisible whole.
_	For the second season, Chris Carmack, who recurred in six episodes of season one as Will Lexington, the rising country star struggling with the realization that he might be gay, as well as Lennon Stella and Maisy Stella as Rayna's daughters, were promoted to regulars.
_	Perhaps the greatest fear that propelled him to work so fervently in these areas was the realization that the consequences of nuclear material ending up in the wrong hands could be severe.
_	Soon maturing from a focus on initiation pranks through the realization that they had something of real lasting value, Clay helped write a formal constitution and required each meeting to have a healthy literary program.
_	Since not all reverse payments are anticompetitive, Morrison says, "A company with a very solid patent, but with the knowledge that there is always a chance it may be struck down and with the realization that even winning a patent case costs lots of money, may be willing to make a modest payment to gain several years of peace and profits." so the problem is "separating the wheat from the chaff."
_	This argument stemmed from the realization that white middle-class women did not serve as an accurate representation of the feminist movement as a whole.
_	Triumph for the Allies in North Africa in the spring of 1943, and the realization that the Japanese would not surrender in large numbers, resulted in the internment of principally German troops from the defeated Afrika Korps.
_	Where do I fit in?'—lies in the realization that he "doesn't"."
_	Sarah's final thoughts were left in a letter to Laura detailing her guilt, that she was Laura's mother, and the realization that she had come to love her.
_	"Out of that came the realization that Yogi was in charge", said second baseman Bobby Richardson.
_	Barker (featured in the movie "Apple Pie") struggled in her own life, including a bout with alcoholism, and came to the realization that a running program gave her "respect for my body and all the things it can do."
_	If this is, on the surface, a most improbable transition, it also feels inevitable here, as Giorgio arrives at the realization that ‘love within reason is not love at all’ . . . but I didn’t stop to think that I was listening to songs.
_	It came into existence from the realization that weather systems move across country boundaries; and that knowledge of pressure, temperature, precipitations, etc. upstream and downstream is needed for weather forecasting.
_	She comes to the realization that their relationship has brought meaning to the life she had been leading.
_	The significance of the concept of a Hilbert space was underlined with the realization that it offers one of the best mathematical formulations of quantum mechanics.
_	This time as a mature person and with the realization that his father is no demon after all, but yet another victim struggling with poverty and still a loving father.
_	She comes to the realization that Ingrid was born in the year of the Ox, and Denton and herself were both born on the year of the Rooster.
_	Both RISC and MIPS were developed from the realization that the vast majority of programs did not use the vast majority of a processor's instructions.
_	The novel contains a portrayal of the psychological conflicts of the young woman, raised a Mormon but gradually coming to the realization that she wants a supposedly less constricted life.
_	This, along with life experience and education, brought Birney to the realization that slavery must be abolished once and for all.
_	Nationalism and class solidarity were developed through the growth of consciousness, and with time, the realization that the use of arms would be required was also fostered.
_	Wall Street bears attacked the stock shortly after the Golden Spike, after the realization that the Northern Pacific was a very long road with very little business.
_	The decreasing rate of construction is due to the realization that too many power plants had been built and some existing plants were being used far below capacity.
_	In 2002 the group members, having matured both personally and professionally, came to the realization that a split with the Bad Boy label was necessary due to the lack of interest.
_	Allen Rivkin, one of the writers working on the script, commented that a large setback for the film's production was the realization that "we couldn't call Hirohito a war criminal because we knew we had to deal with him later…
_	Yang began to come to the realization that his fall was near, but still commented as if he did not care.
_	Under Israeli pressure to send its own SOF teams into western Iraq, and the realization that British SAS were already hunting Scuds, US Secretary of Defense Dick Cheney proposed using US SR teams as well as SAS
_	However, the realization that emancipation would be gradual had a sobering effect.
_	Upon the realization that there was no gold in Shantigo, Harden decided to leave Shantigo alone, but Beet kept fighting, as he didn't want Harden to harm the humans any more.
_	They proposed that it was the realization that they were not the only ones who experienced these feelings.
_	Other records indicate that the move was also prompted by the series of fires in theater-houses and the realization that packed parterre crowds were a possible fire hazard.
_	April becomes depressed and coming to the realization that her life is pointless she takes a promicin shot, gaining the ability to make anyone truthfully answer any direct question she asks.
_	According to Chambliss, the mystical teachings within these Upanishads discuss "the way of knowledge of the Self", a union, the realization that the Self (Atman) and the Brahman are identical.
_	Jeff comes to the realization that their efforts this year inadvertently led to Greendale being sold.
_	Interest is also being driven by the realization that KM can happen without a lot of explicit governance.
_	In this non-canon story bringing together two of Harrison Ford's best-known roles, Indy and Short Round discover a crash-landed "Millennium Falcon" in the Pacific Northwest, along with Han Solo's skeleton and the realization that a rumored nearby Sasquatch is in fact Chewbacca.
_	Illuminated only by flashlights, they seek meaning in their personal and family histories and undergo surgical and revealing discussions about family, survival and individualism only to come to the realization that they are unable to fully understand their father's past and the events that haunted him.
_	Several protagonists come to the realization that they are merely fictional characters, or at least begin to question the reality of their situation.
_	An example of this is the notion that as an individual, one needs an alternative perspective to come to the realization that they are a 'self'.
_	Nityalila (Band) was born out of the realization that artists and musicians have the “powers” to empower, educate, and inspire the people, especially the youth, towards embracing our own culture and from there, creating original art forms and music.
_	The student movement and women's movement in the United States called into question not just needed educational reforms and social imbalances, but led to the realization that the political system and the structures of power were authoritarian and coercive and needed restructuring.
_	On the way, Homer and Isobel are perturbed by the realization that what the fieldwork of foreign aid organizations is equivalent to the white man's destruction of indigenous cultures in North America.
_	He couldn't handle the realization that women aren't perfect and angelic as they appear to be.
_	Upon the realization that his genitals were cut off and grafted onto Grace, he starts to cry.
_	With the realization that intelligence would serve as the first line of defense, the NSC thought it was necessary that the newly formed CIA's performance was as efficient as possible.
_	Yup'ik girl in the banks of Alaska must endure the realization that her traditional way of life is changed forever with the arrival of Christian missionaries.
_	Richard Harrington of "The Washington Post" described the song as "a simple lament of great beauty and sadness pleading for the realization that ideological battles about right and left obscure the more important issue of right and wrong."
_	Soon after, the need to launch a full-fledged awareness building Campaign for Human Rights became clear, and this was followed, soon afterward, by the realization that victim rehabilitation was also essential.
_	He begins with the realization that every new technology disrupts the previous rhythms of consciousness.
_	One outcome of firesetting experimentation is the realization that the quenching, or dousing the rock face with water after heating, is not necessary to making the rock face easier to excavate.
_	Within hours it becomes clear to the residents of Black Mountain that this is no ordinary blackout, and they come to the realization that the power may remain off for a very long time.
_	And finally, despite my previous acceptance of evolutionary theory as 'fact,' I came to the realization that intelligent design, as a theory of origins, is no more religious, and no less scientific, than evolutionism.
_	It wasn't long before she came to the realization that she was meant to research and edit such a book, despite having no training or experience for the task.
_	When attempting to pull the trigger Rick would come to the realization that Shane never put any ammo into his gun, and must've brought
_	This led Dexter to the realization that Brian was the Ice Truck Killer.
_	In addition, study of classical documents led to the realization that some historical documents are less reliable than others, which led to the beginnings of biblical criticism.
_	One of the changes around the same time as Barrett's reports was the realization that all the model work completed thus far had to be restarted from scratch, as it was not detailed enough to be blown up on a motion picture-sized screen.
_	Things go from bad to worse as she comes to grips with the realization that the man may not be a suited father figure to her unborn child.
_	Critical shortages of copper combined with a lack of manufacturing capacity led Baker-Raulang (and the government) to the realization that gasoline powered truck and forklifts were the answer.
_	These changes were made possible by the realization that expertise mattered more than kinship, as physicians recommended nurses they trusted.
_	Schmeckenbier relates this painting to the Baptism: "a rural religious ceremony whose tragedy is intensified by the realization that this son of the fresh green Kansas prairies was sacrificed on a battlefield whose ideological remoteness was as dramatic as its geographical makeup."
_	The 118-year-old man cackles triumphantly as he springs back into awareness with the realization that his younger self has finally found his one true love and life.
_	"It is not Spain that we see in her clean impassioned movement; it is the realization that Spain's tragedy is ours, is the whole world's tragedy."
_	It was hard for him to come to the realization that the "famed state police noted for legendary exploits in fighting the forces of evil was mostly a myth and that his chosen field of endeavor was in reality the tool of politicians."
_	However, they wanted the song not to appear too close to the content of the episode lyrically, so as not to distract the viewer with the realization that the song was composed specifically for the episode, despite the lyrics being thematically relevant but not overly specific to the context.
_	He joined a twelve-step program in 2001, and has said of his addiction that he "came to the realization that I didn't really need [drugs or alcohol] for my quick wit."
_	The meaning of emptiness as contemplated here is explained at M I.297 and S IV.296-97 as the "emancipation of the mind by emptiness" ("suññatā cetovimutti") being consequent upon the realization that "this world is empty of self or anything pertaining to self" ("suññam ida attena vā attaniyena vā").
_	He soon came to the realization that, in order to compete in the field, he needed to choose a specialty, stating that what one sacrifices in width and breadth one gains in depth.
_	The second section (Uttara-khanda) of the text discusses yoga and meditation, asserting the goal of yoga is inner liberation, the realization that the Brahman is within oneself.
_	During their attempts to survive the hostile alien world, the group meet Michael Collins, who helps them survive and come to the realization that the Beyonder has seemingly brought them together to evaluate them and see who wins in a battle amongst themselves.
_	Shocked by the realization that the woman he loves and the man he despises have been lovers all the way, Shamokhin rushes off and returns to his father's home.
_	The goal is to help a writer learn to address the various exigences that they may encounter with the realization that no writing is decontextualized—it always addresses a specific audience.
_	His success followed the realization that the right grapes could grow in the cold climate, producing an inexpensive good wine that could reach a commercial market.
_	Further observational improvements led to the realization that our Sun is one of hundreds of billions of stars in a galaxy we call the Milky Way, which is one of at least hundreds of billions of galaxies in the Universe.
_	Project Cuddle was formed as a 501(c)(3) non-profit charity in 1994 by Debbe Magnusen after having the realization that every day babies were being abandoned around the world by mothers of all ages.
_	He stopped efforts to become a physician from the realization that it was a self-invented distraction.
_	For Orton, the realization that major environmental problems cannot be resolved within an industrial system, distinguishes deep ecology from "shallow ecology."
_	The knowledge revolution was also driven by the realization that enormous amounts of knowledge would be required by many simple AI applications.
_	"Emotionless" was written about the realization that the Madden brothers would not talk to their dad again.
_	This transformation rests principally on the realization that patients with so-called 'mental illnesses' are really individuals with illnesses of the nerves and brain, ..." Today, the Wilhelm Griesinger Hospital in Berlin is named in his honor.
_	Bruce suddenly comes to the realization that his father experienced tremendous stress when he died, and that to restore him, he has to compensate.
_	Although the guinea pig trials caused one Chemical Corps general to remark, "Now we know what to do if we ever go to war against guinea pigs", the tests resulted in the realization that the M33 could not compete with the casualty volume caused by atomic weapons.
_	FBI special agent Dale Cooper (Kyle MacLachlan) has been sent to the town to investigate and has come to the realization that the killer was Laura's father, Leland Palmer (Ray Wise), who acted while possessed by a demonic entity, Killer BOB (Frank Silva).
_	While this debate led to the realization that the compound can be used as a molecular switch, it also created a new problem since none of the recognized types of isomerism could explain the existence of a molecule in two structural forms that differ only in the length of one or more bonds (and not in their stereochemistry or connectivity of the atoms).
_	In early 2006, a group of environmental advocates and business leaders convened to form PHILGBC with the realization that an organization is needed to promote greener buildings and coordinate efforts to sustainability.
_	Air Force successes in exploiting enemy information systems during Operation Desert Storm led to the realization that the strategies and tactics of command and control warfare could be expanded to the entire information spectrum and be implemented as information warfare.
_	The Project was born out of the realization that apart from the state brief system that handles only capital offences, and the huge backlog of cases, there is no statutory free Legal Aid provision in Uganda despite the fact that a large part of Uganda's population lives below the poverty line, and without means to access justice.
_	Finally, he is redeemed with the realization that his work has saved thousands, compared to the few lives destroyed by his actions.
_	Vent/Aile suddenly reverts to human due to the realization that the hatred of the Mavericks that he/she has kept inside his/her heart is the last thing needed to unleash Model W's full power, thus resulting in his/her temporary defeat.
_	It is said that when the opera was performed, many people were offended and walked out, leaving Hajibeyov with the realization that he had outpaced his generation too much this time.
_	In this section, Ishmael wrestles with the realization that he cannot follow Ahab to a fiery doom but must be content with “attainable felicity,” (Ch. 94) but Ahab then takes over once more.
_	This led to the field of statistical mechanics and the realization that gases undergo irreversible processes.
_	Time-sharing was developed out of the realization that while any single user would make inefficient use of a computer, a large group of users together would not.
_	Sorsha arrives and reveals his identity; Lug, furious upon the realization that Madmartigan is not a woman, starts a brawl, allowing Willow, Madmartigan, and the brownies to escape.
_	Ted comes to the realization that he is the recipient of a significant amount of money.
_	"You Can Go Home" could have been a poignant wish for the good, old days, but in Hillman's hands becomes the realization that maybe you shouldn't want to go back to the way it was."
_	This puts Jennifer in the uncomfortable position of her loyalty to Jack conflicting with the realization that they both need Manuel's help to survive.
_	In 1988 the Odebrecht Foundation began focusing on preparing and grooming adolescents for life due to the realization that adolescence is the period when people consolidate the values and ideas that shape their character.
_	The key to this viewpoint is the realization that Wisconsin "'adopted this rule in the course of constructing a complex social welfare system that necessarily deals with the intimacies of family life'"—that Wisconsin made a "permissible exercise of [its] power" even though its results may not be as intended.
_	This design came about with the realization that making the Wii Zapper functionally independent from attachments would "allow for more diverse play styles."
_	Until the realization that "Cali" was Tammy Jo Alexander, Dyson lived with the belief that her sister had escaped her home and made a new life somewhere with a husband and children.
_	Their joy is tempered by the realization that Henry Frankenstein (Colin Clive) is also apparently dead.
_	Escaping to Aladdin's hideout, the pair bonds over the realization that they both feel trapped in their own environments and long for better lives.
_	This also helps Jimmy come to the realization that Dandy was Twisty's accomplice.
_	This fails and Kazuma is forced to come to the realization that he will not be able to save the "Emiru" he has come to love.
_	Hilliard says the crystal was a test; James comes to the realization that they failed the test and kills Hilliard, his alternative self, to prevent further time travel.
_	This instance triggered the realization that she did not want to be a lab tech; she wanted to do research, so when she graduated from Simmons College in 1953, she accepted the invitation to graduate school at University of Wisconsin Medical School from Dr. Robert Schilling.
_	That they have grown up as brother and sister delays the realization that they love each other; indeed, for much of their adolescence they are deeply at odds with one another.
_	Other stressors that add to the emotional situation are the realization that the service member is being deployed to a combat zone where his life is threatened.
_	After their last interview, in which the two continue to affect their romantic feelings for one another, Peeta comes to the realization that Katniss has staged her love for him all along.
_	After a long time, I suddenly awoke to the realization that what I inwardly witnessed agreed entirely with the idea of 'great change' in the Confucian transmission ... hence my own understanding of Confucianism was not derived from book learning.
_	Pat still does not recall how or why he was separated from his wife, and only when he watches the wedding video, which his mother had hidden, do the memories eventually return — with the realization that he and Nikki will never be reunited.
_	Toward the end of the 1990s, the increasing repression of dissidents by the Vietnamese authorities at home and the collapse of many communist dictatorial regimes in Eastern Europe, especially through non-violent revolutions, led many Vietnamese human rights activists and organizations to the realization that a worldwide coordination is needed to maximize the efficiency of efforts to improve human rights in Vietnam.
_	As Saddam was assured of support both financial and militarily in his war against the Islamic Republic of Iran not only from the USA, but from France, Britain, and the USSR, the Kurdish groups eventually came to the realization that they must unite against the common foe (Saddam).
_	Pammy joins her friends Ethan and Jack on a trip to Maine, where they come to the realization that their collective nostalgia for simpler times and rural life is largely invented.
_	Later, Brunel returns to Dr. Zonfeld's office, but he discovers her corpse where she had committed suicide, leaving a note where she admits the realization that she cannot live in a world in which Morlar also lives, apologizing to Brunel for leaving the mess for him to deal with.
_	The obstacle to war between the communists and capitalists was no longer the fear that the other side was more powerful, but rather the realization that nuclear arsenals were now large enough and deadly enough that winning would still likely result in the destruction of one's own country and perhaps the rest of the world as well.
_	The Sustainable Seafood Movement is an initiative born through the realization that the marine ecosystems of the world were being overexploited and destroyed.
_	Such research led to the realization that medical error can be the result of "system flaws, not character flaws", and that greed, ignorance, malice or laziness are not the only causes of error.
_	The term "Sonder" has been noted as well for its relation to other people, its definition meaning "the realization that each random passerby is living a life as vivid and complex as your own".
_	An eavesdropping Madame Giry becomes enraged at the realization that all she and Meg have done for the Phantom over the years has been for nothing ("Ten Long Years").
_	1843: With the realization that Canada West (formerly Upper Canada) and Canada East (formerly Lower Canada) had vastly different educational needs, the Act of 1841 was repealed.
_	Boltzmann's famous equation formula_47 is the realization that the entropy is proportional to formula_71 with the constant of proportionality being Boltzmann's constant.
_	Han finally comes to the realization that there is more than one Fett following him.
_	It is the story of self-confidence and reassurance, accepting who you are and the realization that our differences make each of us beautiful and unique.
_	One night while listening to all of my demos, I came to the realization that I shouldn't be signed, because I didn't have any great songs yet.
_	In the 19th century the beginnings of academic art history, led by German universities, led to much better understanding and appreciation of medieval art, and a more nuanced understanding of classical art, including the realization that many if not most treasured masterpieces of sculpture were late Roman copies rather than Greek originals.
_	By January 1990, talk of the waning of conservative power and a possible socialist government had given way to the realization that, like the Lockheed affair of the mid-1970s, the Recruit scandal did not signal a significant change in who ruled Japan.
_	After the two discuss how weird it is to be around each other they come to the realization that they're not friends, and agree that after the dinner they shouldn't see each other again.
_	However, she begins to second-guess her actions when Brian tells her that he will not be transferring to her school- the realization that Brian truly accepts their break-up shakes her.
_	For example, when Soviet planners attempted to "rationalize", collectivize, and commercialize traditional Indigenous livelihoods such as reindeer husbandry, their efforts were frustrated by the realization that indigenous peoples worldviews treated such economies as intrinsically tied to non-economically quantifiable values of social and spiritual significance, which ran contrary to Soviet modernization rationale.
_	The male narrator explains to his significant other that she has constantly been mistreating him; and although he still shows great affection for her, he ultimately comes to the realization that their relationship is in serious jeopardy because of her actions and therefore contemplates ending the relationship for good.
_	However, soon her inner- self-came to the realization that music was her destiny.
_	Back at the station, Quark discovers Eris' collar is a fake, and they deduce that she is a spy for the Dominion, which she admits before transporting away — leaving the crew with the realization that their dealings with this powerful new opponent have only begun.
_	Both Wilbur and Fern are, at first, horrified by the realization that life must end; however, by the end of the novel, both characters learn to accept that everything must die.
_	Locals have now come to the realization that trees need legal recognition, and must be protected for future generations.
_	This change of outlook was attributed to the combined effects reeducation efforts including "Der Ruf", the realization that the war was lost, and prisoner interactions with Americans.
_	Deely explains that "at the heart of semiotics is the realization that the whole of human experience, without exception, is an interpretive structure mediated and sustained by signs."
_	The construction of a new oil refinery in Cologne by Esso close to a Wacker site, combined with the realization that ethylene would be a cheaper raw-material prompted Wacker to investigate its potential uses.
_	Williams came to the realization that her marriage was not salvageable as the sixth season commenced, while Leakes became upset with Moore after the later went against "girl code" by inappropriately communicating with Nida.
_	Though his job did not provide task variety or identity, he still experienced meaningfulness through the realization that others depended on his work.
_	Hope tries to kill Snow once he gets him alone, but after coming to the realization that he had just been blaming Snow to cope with his mother's death, they settle their differences.
_	Direct competition with a free ferry from the Steelworks lead to the realization that the line would be underutilized.
_	Argov was stung by what he viewed as their betrayal, as well as the realization that there was no hope of reconciling with his ex-wife Bracha after she remarried at around this time.
_	As she goes through an outline of her life, skimming through the pages of her mental scrapbook, she builds up to the realization that, good or bad, she managed to get through her life and that she is a survivor.
_	Compounding his situation is the realization that the unbridled violence practiced by the students may be the result of demonic possession.
_	Around that time he was coming to the realization that, in his words, "The culture of a public accounting firm is the antithesis of developing software.
_	Gordon stated, “I came to the realization that I just wasn’t performing the way that I once was, So I said, ‘What is another career that will allow me to have an impact, have influence on younger kids and also leave behind a positive legacy?’
_	Hitler came to the realization that Kahr sought to control him and was not ready to act against the government in Berlin.
_	Sam’s grandmother is suspicious of Jack’s intentions, but has to contend with the realization that she may be suffering from Alzheimer’s.
_	He was heartbroken with the realization that it would be necessary for him to sever ties with his German friends.
_	The era of modernity is characterised socially by industrialisation and the division of labour and philosophically by "the loss of certainty, and the realization that certainty can never be established, once and for all" .
_	The New Warriors slowly come to the realization that it has been August 27th for five days now.
_	Upon seeing voice actor David Hayter's name alongside that of the main characters, she googled his name and made the realization that there were actual people who voiced the characters and she realized that was what she wanted to do as a career.
_	During the show, Stacy comes to the realization that she is not the right one for Derek and lets him go.
_	In the course of their exchange, Stöhr had the realization that Kalkbrenner would be the perfect choice as the film's star.
_	As his knowledge increased, so did the realization that all of his earlier studies had been very incomplete.
_	In the Netherlands, there is relatively little formal regulation of the smart shop industry, but the natural concentration of expertise about a relatively exotic range of products in combination with the realization that closer public scrutiny and regulation are always lurking in the background have caused the smart shops to organize into an industry association that, among other things, promotes the spread of information about its wares.
_	Yet refinements in dating the ages of the different units has led to the realization that an interval of rock in one area may be exactly the same age as the rocks in another area, yet be referred to by a completely different formation name.
_	Vitale grew up in The Bronx and came to the realization that there were two very different worlds which didn't co-mingle.
_	This work combined with advances in structural characterization techniques such as NMR spectroscopy and X-ray crystallography together with computational modeling, has pushed forward the realization that RNA is a dynamic yet viable drug target.
_	However, she gradually begins to change soon afterward, beginning with the realization that she no longer needs her hearing aid and is able to swing her legs over the side of her bed again.
_	O'Donnell converted to Roman Catholicism on his deathbed perhaps due to the realization that he might not be allowed to be buried in his church.
_	On her way home to New York, she comes to the realization that her long distance relationship with Todd wasn't working and that they were over a long time ago.
_	Since the realization that the embryophytes emerged from within the green algae, some authors are starting to include them.
_	FBI special agent Dale Cooper (Kyle MacLachlan) has been sent to the town to investigate, and has come to the realization that the killer was possessed by a demonic entity—Killer BOB (Frank Silva).
_	Struck with the realization that McPherson could cut him off from the bridge over the Big Black River, Bowen ordered the formidable defenses at Grand Gulf abandoned, the magazine exploded, and the heavy artillery destroyed.
_	It's a novel that grapples with the ephemeral experience of being human and the realization that we create a lifetime of memories that vanish when we do".
_	It was also there that he studied and focused on Saint Thomas Aquinas and during his free time went to the churches of the saints and the Apostles - he also came to the realization that science could in fact also lead a man to God.
_	Davis confirmed he would drop to the Lightweight division for his next UFC appearance and said he made the decision after the realization that his frame is better suited for 155 pounds.
_	The concept was enabled by the realization that engineered forms of silicon carbide and pyrolytic carbon were quite strong, even at temperatures as high as 2000 °C (3600 °F).
_	Yet the realization that these elements can form a coherent whole that provides significant benefits to organizations by focusing on a common methodology is relatively new.
_	Stephanie proposes to Griffin, but Griffin refuses and dumps her after coming to the realization that if Stephanie did love him she would accept him for who he was and not what he was.
_	On a travel to Skjåk in 1894, he came to the realization that Norwegian farmers had not yet begun to appreciate their cultural heritage.
_	That failure and the realization that most of the remaining infantrymen's enlistments were due to expire by June 1784 led Washington to order Knox, his choice as the commander of the peacetime army, to discharge all but 500 infantry and 100 artillerymen before winter set in.
_	He endures interrogation, beatings, and more in his attempt to return to his family, even as he comes to the realization that his life will never be the same.
_	is an efficient episode that wastes no time directly engaging the game-changing cliffhanger on which last season left the audience." and was glad Deb soon came to the realization that Dexter was a serial killer.
_	This book will force you to acknowledge the fluidity of stasis, the permanence of the in-between, and the realization that when our lives seem most ambiguous, we are perhaps, most clearly our true selves.
_	Greenwood examines the show from a critical and doctrinal standpoint saying that ""The Book of Jeremiah" shares the realization that verisimilitude in fiction is a means, not an end.
_	Cliff sometimes fears that his youngest daughter is growing up too fast, struggling with the realization that soon she will cease to be "his little girl".
_	Frequently he referred to the realization that comes through practicing Kriya as taught by the Guru, and the grace that comes through the 'transmission' of the Guru.
_	He develops a deep bond with his employer, and Nabi comes to the realization that his purpose is to take care of Mr. Wahdati.
_	The Fiduciary Duty in the 21st Century Programme was founded on the realization that there is a general lack of legal clarity globally about the relationship between sustainability and investors’ fiduciary duty.
_	Michael and Holly want to continue their relationship, but as they get closer to Nashua, Holly comes to the realization that their relationship is not going to work with the long distance.
_	Through this analogy, Socrates helped Glaucon come to the realization that Goodness is of inestimable value, being both the source of knowledge and truth, as well as more valuable and unattainable than both.
_	The film, in common with the original stage play, follows the schoolmaster's final few days in his post, as he comes to terms with his sense of failure as a teacher, a sense of weakness exacerbated by his wife's infidelity and the realization that he is despised by both pupils and staff of the school.
_	In the 1990s a second workplace revolution saw the introduction of “new ways of working” a response to the realization that information technology was transforming cultural, social, technological and construction processes.
_	The government was spurred to action by the realization that a $400,000 surplus ($ in ) in the United States Treasury was about to be distributed to the 25 states, but not to territorial governments.
_	The decision to close the base was due to the realization that the B-58 Hustler could be accommodated at other bases through the elimination of B-47 Stratojet units ahead of schedule.
_	Mitchell & Ness found that it could do it, and with the realization that M&N was capable of this task, an idea was born:
_	Since then, we have questioned him about the allegations and have sadly come to the realization that a number of facts have been altered and incidents embellished."
_	Sonnet 126 deals with a marked lapse of time and leads the reader to the realization that the relationship between author and subject has continued on for years but has now begun to wane or fizzle out.
_	We couldn’t, so we came to the realization that we didn’t want to go on like that.
_	Stuck with the realization that he can no longer beat his son, Cleveland slips into a funk that makes him act older than his years.
_	However, as Matthias led campaigns each year, he came to the realization that by the late 15th century it was no longer possible to oust the Ottoman Turks from Europe.
_	This discovery led to the realization that it was a drepanosaurid.
_	Nirvana (or Nibbana), the desired end through Dhyana in Buddhism, is the realization that there is no permanent self nor permanent consciousness; while Moksha, the desired end through Dhyana in Hinduism, is acceptance of Self, realization of liberating knowledge, the consciousness of Oneness with all existence and understanding the whole universe as the Self.
_	James Perone writes of the second track from "Pet Sounds", "You Still Believe in Me", "One of the high points of the composition and Brian's vocal performance ... is the snaky, though generally descending melodic line on the line 'I want to cry,' his response to the realization that his girlfriend still believes in him despite his past failures."
_	When Michael tries to kiss Julia and gets rejected, Julia confronts Tom and comes to the realization that the two aren't really a team.
_	Other Memory had been deeply concerned with the realization that the Kwisatz Haderach might be born a generation earlier.
_	His reasons are complex and can be traced throughout the novel to the realization that he cannot leave and go into exile again in an internment camp in Port Said, Egypt.
_	Lauck discussed her reasons for writing her first and subsequent memoirs with Literary Mama, ""...memoir writing was born from the realization that I wanted to have children.
_	He spent time with Thurman and her newborn daughter, which influenced the Bride character; Tarantino did not come to the realization that the Bride's daughter could still be alive until five months into writing.
_	Japanese industrialization came the realization that Japan was dependent on the supply of many raw materials from overseas locations outside its direct control, and was hence vulnerable to any disruption of that supply.
_	Coming to the realization that he didn't quite get everything he bargained for, Stone begs the Devil to release him from their deal.
_	It's the realization that you never get fully better, it's about embracing the new side of you and making that work in the world that you're in.
_	As the survivors investigate, they discover a farm not too far from the site, leading them to the realization that they are not alone.
_	Japan has realized and acted on the realization that basic knowledge base curriculum does not work anymore.
_	A feeling of ecstasy came with the knowledge that "this was the Palace", the epitome of the more than 15,000 vaudeville theaters in America, and the realization that you have been selected to play it.
_	After enslaved blacks were emancipated, they made efforts to move beyond domestic work and manual labor, but many came to the realization that the only work available to them was domestic work or manual labor (both positions paid very little).
_	For some women, the realization that they participated in behavior or relationships that could be categorized as lesbian caused them to deny or conceal it, such as professor Jeannette Augustus Marks at Mount Holyoke College, who lived with the college president, Mary Woolley, for 36 years.
_	Liz also comes to the realization that Red wanted her to grow more as a FBI profiler and embraces him.
_	In 1989, when the Commission and its process was under review following a panel created by Mayor Koch in 1985, a decision was made to change the process by which buildings are declared to be landmarks due to some perceived issues with the manner by which the Commission operates as well as the realization that the destruction feared when the Commission was formed was no longer imminent.
_	However, as the day goes by, RJ's father is under increasing stress due to Nareshchandra's escalating financial demands, and comes to appreciate Vivaan and his friends for their help in meeting these exactations, coming to the realization that "one's own exploit and abuse while strangers aid and succor," so that, as RJ and the groom are to exchange vows, her father forbids her, breaks of the marriage with Nareshchandra's son, and, changing tack, decides to allow RJ to resume her part in the play's production.
_	Ballas presents Soussan in a sympathetic light, giving voice to his complex relations with his Jewish family and friends, and his struggle as he moves from genuine conviction in Islam to the realization that he will never be fully at home in the Muslim sphere, just as he was not comfortable in the Jewish sphere.
_	Robert Baillie, on the realization that the Parliamentary Independents, despite previous claims of support by Vane, were not on the side of the Scots, wrote "Sir Henry Vane and The Solicitor [St John]... without any regard for us, who have saved their nation and brought their two persons to the height of power now they enjoy and use to our prejudice".
_	Next, the assistant helps the patient recreate the least fearful situation in a safe, controlled environment, continuing until the patient has had an opportunity to allow the fear to subside thus reinforcing the realization that the fear is unfounded.
_	the pieces were dark and almost sinister, reflecting the realization that I was perhaps more like the warhorse than the quiet mares.
_	Creation of the new system was prompted by the realization that at least five related, but ultimately different methods were in common use at the time, with a sizeable minority of examiners not employing any recognized method at all, basing instead their judgment on subjective assessment, or arbitrarily mixing characteristics of the various standardized systems.
_	Coal gasification and liquefaction are recent technologies that are becoming attractive after the realization that oil reserves, at present consumption rates, may be rather short lived.
_	His work was a major step towards a better understanding of chemical reactions and the realization that some substances are composed of chemical combinations of other substances.
_	At first they're enemies, but come to the realization that they must work together if they want to get out alive.
_	The first was the realization that there aren't enough visible stars or gas inside galaxies to account for their high rate of rotation.
_	Upon the realization that he was turning forty soon, he got a new costume, gave himself a new (and fictional) origin, and made an attempt at robbing a bank with henchmen—but it was all a ploy to lure Spider-Man out in order to fight him..
_	"Clubscene" is a fast paced coming-of-age comedy-drama chronicling the self abusing lifestyle of a young clubber as he comes to the realization that there must be something more to his shallow, materialistic, vulgar, yet often hilarious, life.
_	The basis of his argument is the realization that "[a]ny collection of things can be organized so as to have structure "W", provided there are the right
_	This ten years of “wandering in the desert” culminated with the realization that all of his varied experiences had equipped him to write a specific kind of novel, a novel that would vividly make the case for the practicality of strategic nonviolence, especially as articulated by Dr. Gene Sharp.
_	After graduating from the University of Pennsylvania in 1942 with a Phi Beta Kappa key, he attended Harvard Law School, but dropped out after coming to the realization that he didn't want to be a lawyer.
_	According to him, while there, he had the realization that Robert Johnson was the true spiritual owner of his own songs, no matter what businessman owned the rights to them, thus Fogerty decided to start making a new album and to perform his old CCR material regularly in concert.
_	When Spider-Man unmasks and reveals himself to be Peter Parker, Jameson faints in shock at the realization that the man he had been calling a menace had actually been on his payroll for years.
_	A personal sense of responsibility is required for the pursuit of the values that give life meaning, but it is the realization that one holds sole responsibility for rendering life meaningful that allows the values to be actualized and life to be given true purpose.
_	Given the lack of knowledge of human infectious diseases at this time (and well into the 19th century) this was not an unusual conclusion, but what is surprising is that while tulip mosaic disease has a far more impressive and documented history than any other plant virus, the realization that it was a communicable plant disease, let alone a virus, came surprisingly late – a decade after the end of World War I. "Plant virus" to plant pathologists at the time was almost synonymous with the tobacco mosaic virus, which had been discovered in 1897, quite soon after bacteriology had become established as an academic subject.
_	In 1965, the United States rapidly increased its military forces in South Vietnam, prompted by the realization that the South Vietnamese government was losing the Vietnam War as the communist-dominated Viet Cong gained influence over much of the population in rural areas of the country.
_	Research work during the last 30 years established such important phenomena as stable mRNA and translational control, isolation and characterization of the mitotic apparatus, and the realization that the major structural proteins of the mitotic apparatus are microtubules.
_	Shaken by the realization that he is financially incapable of leading his family, Nettooran goes to his friend Unnithan for advice.
_	But shattered by the realization that he had thrown away a win, Staunton blundered again with 33...Rxd4?? 34.exd4! f6 35.gxh5 and Black resigned.
_	Buck becomes a national hero for his actions in Florida, but he has had enough of celebrity - estranged from his family, harried by his captivity, and badly shaken by the realization that his TV persona has become a role model for violent racists like Blister.
_	A faction of Spacers have come to the realization that Spacer culture is stagnating due to negative population growth and longevity, and feels that the solution is to encourage further space exploration and colonization by Earthmen in concert with robots.
_	Salvation therefore is described as the realization that all finite reality is essentially dependent on the Supreme.
_	She awakens some time later, disappointed at the realization that she is alive.
_	As their musical goals came into focus, they came to the realization that they may not be ready to play what they heard in their heads.
_	He finds himself facing off against an increasing variety of creatures (including other wizards), while facing the realization that his various cases may all be tied together behind the scenes and that his role might be even greater than he is willing to admit.
_	Patanjali tells us – तस्य सप्तधा प्रान्तभूमिः प्रज्ञा (Yoga Sutras II.27) that the experiencer gains the knowledge of the Atman in seven stages, advancing towards the highest beginning with - a) the realization that the source of all spiritual wisdom is inside us, and proceeding to b) when attachments and aversions lose their power, to c) complete realization of, and union with the Atman when the objective universe disappears, to d) when the man of illumination no longer identifies the external world with the Atman, to e) when the mind and the objective world ends their services to the experiencer, to f) when the stored-up impressions within the mind and the gunas fall away forever, and finally to g) when the state of eternal existence in union with the Atman is reached.
_	Roberta becomes upset and angry that two innocent people were killed and also by the realization that her mother died violently, contrary to what she was told.
_	After a flight together, Bud and Ann crash-land and spend a night in a deserted cabin, leading to the realization that Ann must seek a divorce.
_	Study of this topic has led to the realization that people sometimes tend to anticipate what will happen in the future based on a previous perception.
_	The initial stage of research yielded the following results: experts developed a common terminology to describe the protective properties of the respirators; a methodology for measuring protection factors in different conditions of respirators' usage in the workplaces and laboratories; and the realization that national legislation should set limits for the use of all types of respirators based on their performance, measured not in the laboratory, but in the workplaces.
_	Raghu's sister eventually comes to the realization that her brother has probably died as a result of police torture, but hasn't the heart to tell her father.
_	The establishment of the post office in 1892 lead to the realization that Orr Glen was already a registered town name in Pennsylvania, so the name finally became Orrtanna in 1892, for Isaiah Orr, a large property owner in the area, and a nearby tannery.
_	Glancy purposely gives many of the characters narrations and thoughts about land to alert her audience, most of whom are probably of mainstream American culture, to the realization that Indian Removal did more than just change the location of the Cherokee, it also changed their beliefs and their connection with nature.
_	The peace and tranquility of the surroundings of the church and, with time, the decreasing number of active parishioners, has led to the realization that this location is an ideal spot for the establishment of a small monastic community.
_	Ultimately "LA Song" is about emerging from depression and self-doubt to the realization that who you are isn't about where you are or what's around you but that "THE GOOD LIFE LIES WITHIN."
_	In the end Eric must face the events which led to his death, and the realization that why the reason his soul cannot rest is because he blames himself for being unable to save Shelly.
_	Coming to the realization that his son may end up being killed for being the mole, Tom attempts to connect with Hal by bringing up the past and his mother to defuse the situation without any loss of life.
_	Further insight into Webern's attitudes comes with the realization that Nazism itself was deeply multifaceted, marked "not [by] a coherent doctrine or body of systemically interrelated ideas, but rather [by] a vaguer worldview made up of a number of prejudices with varied appeals to different audiences which could scarcely be dignified with the term 'ideology.'"
_	Under the realization that faculty salaries were considerably low compared to other colleges in the western United States, BYU periodically increased the salary of employees, particularly female employees.
_	Kupka arrived at abstraction with the realization that “it was possible to experience great joy and excitement in the mere contemplation of colours and lines” and the desire to create paintings that effected the viewer the way music did.
_	During the exercise of his Mentat powers, Duncan comes to the realization that Alia has fallen into Abomination, and helps Jessica escape Alia's murderous plot.
_	"Time" wrote: "The death last week of Thomas Clayton Wolfe shocked critics with the realization that, of all American novelists of his generation, he was the one from whom most had been expected."
_	The development of a wholesome person, participating member of the home, the community and the world through: experience in group living, finding a variety of opportunities for creative expression, confidence to explore and valuing the thinking-questing process, acquiring skills to move ahead in life, sense of fulfillment in accomplishment, respect for the individual's worth, consideration for others and the beauty in cooperative effort with reverence and appreciation for all manifestations of life and the realization that a child grows up only once and the need to let his childhood would be a happy one.
_	When asked how he beat his addictions, Cornell stated, "It was a long period of coming to the realization that this way (sober) is better.
_	Bart awakens with the realization that he wants a brother.
_	Melanie comes to the realization that she is not an experiment, and that her kind will be the future.
_	The withdrawn and mysterious pilot of Evangelion Unit-00, Rei Ayanami, is a clone made from the salvaged remains of Yui and is plagued by a sense of negative self-worth stemming from the realization that she is an expendable asset.
_	However, a greater understanding of general relativity led to the realization that such singularities were a generic feature of the theory and not just an exotic special case.
_	Many within the university thought present-day North Campus was too far to be a part of the University, however Briggs argued that it was the best location because it would allow for the most expansion, and with this expansion came the realization that the physical and architectural face of the university was changing.
_	Upon the realization that the pillboxes (Blockhouses) were withholding the advance of his division, Pérez took it upon himself to charge the fortifications and blast them away with grenades.
_	When Kagenobu doesn’t answer her, Eliza comes to the realization that she simply killed Fernandez because he was not Japanese.
_	Walker attributed his success to the realization that business conditions, no matter the field of endeavor, constantly change: "A lot of my contemporaries who didn't change as things dictated they should didn't last very long.
_	The teacher advises that the realization that life is only a big dream can help us finally liberate ourselves from the chains of various emotions, different kinds of attachment and the chains of ego.
_	Jim, however, decides to stand up to his mother with the realization that his father provoked the shooting.
_	Their premise was based on the realization that, unlike law, business or medicine, post graduate training in the area of leadership was non existent, and they wanted to train young veterans in the leadership skills necessary to assure that our democratic system of government could more effectively meet the needs of its citizens.
_	When Koyuki helps her, she and the council come to the realization that she herself is the most qualified.
_	Ryan's surprisied to hear her say this, and admits that he doesn't see Madison as his girlfriend, making Madison heartbroken upon the realization that Ryan was probably never going to feel the same way about her as she did about him.
_	Addison had no polite words for his eldest daughter but the experience was a liberating one for the girl, who left the train with the realization that she was now an adult and her father could no longer strike her.
_	Seeking to hide the secret once and for all, Bess distracts Jessica with the realization that she "allowed" Tess to emerge to punish Natalie and Jared, and convinces
_	If decision maker choose to take a new course, because of the realization that actions are required to prevent an ongoing decline, they need at first to search for new strategies (4).
_	In the kitchen, Jon is faced with a still frozen turkey and the realization that he doesn't know how to prepare a Thanksgiving dinner, and he has no idea what to do now.
_	In January 2005, Claire Borowik, a spokesperson for TFI, stated that:[d]ue to the fact that our current zero-tolerance policy regarding sexual interaction between adults and underage minors was not in our literature published before 1986, we came to the realization that during a transitional stage of our movement, from 1978 until 1986, there were cases when some minors were subject to sexually inappropriate advances ...
_	The 2008 "Legacy Edition" release of "Tapestry" coupled a remastered version of the "Tapestry" album with a second disc which featured live performances by King - from concerts in 1973 and 1976 - of all of the songs from "Tapestry" except for "Where You Lead", reflecting the fact that soon after the release of "Tapestry" King came to the realization that "Where You Lead" was somewhat politically incorrect and as a result stopped performing it live, only reinstating the song in her concert setlists following its 2000 lyrical revision (see Section 3 below).
_	The most effusive praise was offered in poetic form by John Taylor, who in September 1828 imagined that if Milton and Nicolas Poussin were both alive to see the painting, Milton would view it with "proud delight", while Poussin would suffer an "envious thorn" with the realization that Etty's abilities had surpassed his own.
_	Rani sees his willingness to so easily give his life for her and comes to the realization that his love must indeed be true.
_	He arrives in the midst of a winter storm to a blue collar Midwestern city, quickly coming to the realization that this is far from the free-spirited beach atmosphere that he has been accustomed to.
_	Sagawa said he fainted after the shock of shooting her, but awoke with the realization that he had to carry out his plan.
_	The bedrock of our unity is the realization that we're all brothers and sisters created by the same God."
_	The subsequent discovery by Hambali and Sizemore led to the realization that it was in fact a distinct species.
_	At the orphanage, Sunday gained orderly habits, a decent primary education, and the realization that he was a good athlete.
_	Initially, the four had planned to drink and do drugs in the shelter, but the realization that they were unable to escape initiated group hysteria.
_	Her predicament exemplifies the situation of every Filipino person who has come to the realization that life in the Philippines often does not allow the working person to earn money enough to save for a better living.
_	The song very generally tells a story of "Johnny" and "Jenny," the two members of a musical group called "The Human Race" (the members' instruments of choice appear to change throughout the song, though Johnny is primarily a guitarist and Jenny is a bassist) on their quest for fame in the industry, though at one point the lyrics note that they come to the realization that they could make "more money on a movie screen."
_	He reaches the realization that the individual can die without the machine either slowing or stopping, regardless of whether the individual has completed his part of the work of that machine.
_	Academic fraud began to come into the picture after the realization that a large percentage of student-athletes were not academically fit to perform.
_	In a similar vein, Lynn White reflected on the shift from the biblical idea that animals were put on earth to serve man, to the realization that man must live in harmony with beast.
_	At the level of quantum field theory, Kaluza–Klein theory unifies gravity with gauge interactions, based on the realization that gravity propagating in small, compact extra dimensions is equivalent to gauge interactions at long distances.
_	Pete states he has come to the realization that he never should have married his wife Trudy; he should have married Peggy, instead, when he "had the chance".
_	When one of his men interrupts him, Nishikiyama's rage and anger over the realization that Kiryu will always overshadow him as a yakuza boils over, and he stabs the man to death before using the blood to slick back his hair, completing his transformation into the man Kiryu would encounter during the main story.
_	The concept of Earthquake Duration Magnitude - originally proposed by Bisztricsany in 1958 using surface waves only - is based on the realization that on a recorded earthquake seismogram, the total length of the seismic wavetrain - sometimes referred to as the CODA - reflects its size.
_	Opinion was still divided on the question of Dome versus Beaver, but with the realization that many schools had domes somewhere similar to Technology's, the Institute Committee decided to use the Beaver on the face of the ring.
_	It’s the realization that everyone she knows has changed.
_	He saw the significance of Sheldon's work in bringing home the realization that it is hard to live a Christ-like life, given the temptations of modern society.
_	Studies of the causes of the lower than expected compression led to the realization that the laser was coupling strongly with the hot electrons (~50 keV) in the plasma which formed when the outer layers of the target were heated, via stimulated raman scattering.
_	Conservation in the United States, as a movement, began with the American sportsmen who came to the realization that wanton waste of wildlife and their habitat had led to the extinction of some species, while other species were at risk.
_	This led to the realization that the fissile material from the fission sections of the bombs, the "primaries", would accumulate in the chamber.
_	I would say that my most interesting experience with the earlier techniques was the realization that when you make cut-ups you do not get simply random juxtapositions of words, that they do mean something, and often that these meanings refer to some future event.
_	Advancements by RCA in optical soundtrack recording led MCA engineers to the realization that an optical track could reliably record and reproduce bass down to 10 Hz.
_	The failure of the collective security of the League of Nations led to the realization that a universal system of security could only be effective if nations agreed to some limitation of their national sovereignty with regard to their right to belligerency, and if the Security Council which had been a "closed shop" during League of Nations times, would open itself up to UN Members who would cede constitutional powers in favor of collective security.
_	Tezuka came to the realization that he could use manga as a means of helping to convince people to care for the world.
_	Church discipline was also utilized to awaken the dormant New Jersey congregations to the realization that some of its parishioners did not meet the scriptural standards of salvation.
_	After the realization that he was married, Major Egan leaves Regina for Nigeria.
_	Thiel stated that the idea for the company was based on the realization that "the approaches that PayPal had used to fight fraud could be extended into other contexts, like fighting terrorism."
_	Arlington departs the home, with Arthur coming to the realization that their choice to push the button has placed the family into purgatory.
_	After the realization that he did not really prefer English, and actually found it quite boring, Wason attended Oxford University to obtain a master's degree in psychology in 1953, and then a doctorate in 1956 from University College London.
_	However, with the realization that the Mediterranean Ridge is an accretionary complex, it became apparent that the Hellenic trench is actually a starved forearc basin, and that the plate boundary lies south of the Mediterranean Ridge.
_	Frankly, I've come to the realization that I'm helping a lot more people now that I ever could as a driver.
_	Even though supply still exceeds demand, there is little will to invoke the Federal Marketing Order out of the realization that any pullback in supply by U.S. growers would easily be filled by Canadian production.
_	At meeting the three men, Jack comes to the realization that Milton is his father, as George Park is Korean and Fred O'Dwyer lost his genitals in a grenade explosion during World War II.
_	Although excavation revealed little of the more southerly part of the complex, the realization that the friary layout had conformed to an orderly plan, with a very imposing church, encouraged what was necessarily a more speculative interpretation of that part of Kirby's Prospect and Plan.
_	We came back with a renewed vigor but also with the realization that there is still a lot more to be done.
_	After treating Matt's wounds, Julia, Sean and Christian come to the realization that despite all their attempts, Matt will never change (with Christian seeming to take it the worst, blaming his amoral and rapist father for passing those genes on) and that he should be turned in to the police.
_	The season was deemed a success despite David Carr being sacked an NFL record 76 times and the realization that Tony Boselli, the man they had hoped would protect their young quarterback, would never play a down of football for the team.
_	Massive public opposition and the realization that the end of the stadium would mean the end of hopes to return CFL football to the capital led the regional government to step in to end the scheme.
_	A few days later, however, the realization that the pool of point guards in the 2012 draft was shallow and Burke's stock was high led to some deliberation for him and his family:
_	The application of behavioral psychology terms to behaviors in the tragedy of the commons led to the realization that the same short-term/long-term cause-effect relationship also applied to other human traps, in addition to the exploitation of commonly held resources.
_	Huebner’s research led him to the realization that no leading business school in the United States offered any type of insurance-related coursework.
_	It was also prompted by the realization that America would play a larger part in fulfillment of Zionist designs after the war.
_	However, the invasion of the island was delayed by the Battle of the Philippine Sea and by the realization that additional troops would be needed for the operation.
_	Chris Keller — Chris, 32, returned home from World War II two years before the play begins, disturbed by the realization that the world was continuing as if nothing had happened.
_	There were just kind of, not necessarily bad vibes, but we came to the realization that we can't do it full-time.
_	Curators have sometimes responded to the realization that an instrument is a Franciolini fraud by shifting it from the public galleries into storage.
_	At first excited at the prospect of attending, Romy then has the realization that they will not be able to make a good impression at the reunion.
_	When Peter comes to the realization that Francis is not his real father and when Stewie dreams about being tortured by Lois, a harp sound can be heard; MacFarlane comments that even small things like that take a lot of work to produce.
_	Key to the study is the realization that the mathematics of such jams, which the researchers call "jamitons," are strikingly similar to the equations that describe detonation waves produced by explosions, says Aslan Kasimov, lecturer in MIT's Department of Mathematics.
_	According to the actor, the source of his character's unusual speech patterns came from the realization that "the purpose of my character was to die."
_	Starting from the realization that the WKB approximation of quantum mechanics leads to deterministic equations and convinced that a mere approximation could not turn a probabilistic theory into a deterministic theory, he doubted the inevitability of the conventional approach to quantum mechanics.
_	However, the realization that the Viet-Minh would not accept compromise led to the US abandoning the idea.
_	With the realization that the Americas represented regions of the Earth of which the Europeans were not aware earlier, there arose intense speculation over the question whether the natives of these lands were true humans or not.
_	Tempted by the realization that the Crystal is the chrysopoeia he and Tring have been ardently seeking, Kreutz steals the Tarnov Crystal before anyone figures what has happened.
_	(Washington was said to "[bubble] with fury when British regular officers expressed their disdain of provincial officers and soldiers", and at the realization that British officers were always senior to colonials regardless of rank.)
_	After starting to practice law on his own, he came to the realization that "the only attorneys in the music business were the attorneys for the record companies, and their job was to get as much money as they could for their company and leave as little as possible for the artists".
_	A five-fold process of recognition, acceptance, co-ordination, integration, and synthesis 'leads to the discovery of the Transpersonal Self, and the realization that that is the final truth of the person, not the subpersonalities'.
_	The murderer leaves, with his victim's body still in his car, and drives to Beachy Head, where, disturbed by the realization that he is not sane, he commits suicide by jumping off the cliff.
_	Other modern theorists labeled Euhemerism as a “subject of classical paganism that was fostered in the minds of the people of the Middle Ages through the realization that while in most respects the ancient Greeks and Roman had been superior to themselves, they had been in error regarding their religious beliefs.
_	Wartime experience in operating the type at overload weights resulted in the realization that the Empires could take off at considerably higher weights than the conservative maxima provided by Shorts and, although the last Empire crossings to America were made in 1940 (by "Clare" and "Clyde"), many more flights were made on the long, demanding and vital over-water Lisbon-Bathurst flights.
_	The transit tax also funded improvements to the adjoining Metromover system, including removal of the 25 cent fare, with the idea that higher ridership on the system would lead to higher Metrorail ridership, as well as the realization that the cost of fare collection exceeded fare revenue.
_	His house is bought by Ned Flanders' cousin Ted, and Homer is annoyed at the realization that he now lives next door to "two" Flanders families.
_	HRH on Dlamini's father was a sadness with the realization that the fate of the daughter and invading the Ayutthaya done it, because he defected to the enemy side.
_	The "divide" part of the divide-and-conquer algorithm comes from the realization that a tridiagonal matrix is "almost" block diagonal.
_	However, the realization that the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) causes AIDS, discredited any potential connection with ASF.
_	Angela comes to the realization that the only place she can have her child is Los Angeles.
_	It's a dramatization of the realization that the act of listening to the radio is a suicidal gesture.
_	The trigger for his outburst is the realization that his hostile mother-in-law (as a favor only to her daughter) plans on providing substantial financial backing for his business.
_	It’s about the unhinged feeling that comes from losing the solid ground on which one has comfortably and complicitly stood for too long, about the realization that the safety provided by such footholds is always illusory, and about learning to live with the shifting, floating impermanence that was there (and not there), enveloping us all along.
_	Public support of hygiene programs have been growing, due in part to the realization that, besides basic humanitarian reasons, such facilities offer people experiencing homelessness an alternative to using restrooms in libraries and other public buildings.
_	One possible motive for the merger is described by ACOP historian Linda Wegner as "the realization that by blending two structures into one, they could expand their spheres of influence and hopefully, their effectiveness of ministry would increase proportionally."
_	The most impressive aspect of Goldman's book, wrote Duffus, was the realization that what motivated Goldman was not "hatred" for the ruling classes, but "sympathy" for the masses.
_	The newly minted freshman saw Simon and Garfunkel in concert in Central Park, but it was visiting Carnegie Hall for the first time to see Judy Collins that invoked the realization that "I had escaped my hometown and was finally beginning to live the life I'd dreamed of."
_	From the book, Margaret Jacob salvages the realization that language is important and that it can have a social force all of its own.
_	"Why don't you start with the realization that probably none of you are going to be back here next year?", after the 2010 elections.
_	Chris is traumatized by the realization that he killed two people and has difficulty coping with his home and school life.
_	Sarah finds one to her liking and bursts into tears of joy at the realization that she is getting married.
_	In Goethe resonates with a developmental historical interest, but above all the realization that behind the cultural diversity (or, depending on the viewing restriction and weight) behind the dualism of the world (West - East) reveals a consistent pattern, an archetype.
_	Although the ending to "Odd Girl Out" did not veer too far from the unsatisfactory resolution formula of "Spring Fire", "Women's Barracks", and Radclyffe Hall's "The Well of Loneliness", it examined Laura's internal struggle in the realization that despite her femininity, she was deeply in love with another woman, and at the end she embraced it, which was rare in lesbian fiction.
_	He enters, finds her body inside and feels compelled to stay with her, eventually making the realization that she is gradually coming back to life.
_	During World War II, Ames came across the realization that thread could snarl and jam a sewing machine motor, Blanche then used that same principle to design a device to ensnare low-flying aircraft.
_	Mike comes to the realization that Jack is his Dark World counterpart and gets stabbed by him, dying.
_	What heals is the realization that there is nothing really to heal."
_	Although the effect lasted only a few weeks, and the patient had to return for another set of treatment, that was the first step to the realization that cancer could be treated by pharmacological agents.
_	As the realization that the Seminoles would resist relocation sank in, Florida began preparing for war.
_	Although Conker had all the money and land in the world, he came to the realization that he didn't want it, and that his only true reason of living was killed before his very eyes.
_	Struck with the realization that he could create his life's ideal cello, he built three prototypes by hand in his basement, the first with fiberglass and the other two with carbon fiber.
_	Partly in response to United States reactions to the earlier nationalizations, and perhaps also partly in response to the realization that foreign investment might play a positive role in the industrialization drive, the government began to take a milder position toward foreign firms.
_	Jack later assassinates Janet Reno after thwarting her coup, which forces him to confront the realization that his time spent researching violent games has turned him into his own "Manchurian Candidate".
_	The public is coming to the realization that great corporations dominate the legislative halls.
_	Papen vehemently objected to being taken into custody, but he later came to the realization that Göring had indeed saved his life.
_	Once a satyr hedonist in the Skola Valley, his planeswalking turned him to nihilism, infusing him with the realization that, in the grand scheme of things, he mattered little and less.
_	As a young woman she entered California State University and began training in their police academy program, but decided that law enforcement was not for her when she came to the realization that she may someday have to use a gun.
_	What is most interesting in the issue is the realization that French writers publish some of their materials in English, and that during international conferences, the French diplomats speak in English.
_	Probably the most important contribution that Alföldi made to the study of ancient history was the realization that epigraphic, numismatic, and archaeological sources are equal and complementary, and that literary sources should not just be treated as an auxiliary scholarly pursuit.
_	Herbert Marcuse for the realization that she could be both an academic—a scholar—and a social catalyst—an activist.
_	A small flying club used another nearby site between the wars and there were plans to build a commercial airport in the Fairlop area for London, but those plans were later abandoned due to the realization that smog and haze from the residential and industrial areas nearby would be a hazard to operations.
_	With the realization that her sentence was not extended, Maria abandons the other rioters and joins Piper and Alex's riot abstention crew to stay out of trouble.
_	They also claim that it took more than half a century from the realization that DNA is the hereditary material of life to the human genome sequence, so that their plan for the next century would be to really understand the sequence itself.
_	He said, <q>I predict that one of the biggest success stories of GPLv3 will be the realization that the entire universe of free and open source software can thus be combined into comprehensive open source solutions for customers worldwide.</q>
_	“GRACE follows the realization that we can only create as much peace outside ourselves as we have created inside ourselves.
_	At the realization that they will not be able to play at all, Clawd apparently cancels SKRM for the season, much to everyone's shock.
_	Anansi was so annoyed by his failed attempts and the realization that his child was right that he let the pot slip.
_	They agree to ditch their cellphones, credit cards, and any attachment to their own lives in the realization that Nathan will be watching.
_	Alan Sepinwall of "HitFix" wrote, "There's plenty of funny stuff for the whole "Brooklyn" ensemble in 'Chocolate Milk,' from Gina slapping Boyle at the thought of them being 'bone bros' to Santiago's eyes going wide with terror at the realization that she just yelled at her captain, to the spectacle of Terry being high.
_	Sheila checks into a local hotel to recover from the shock of her divorce and the realization that Mike has drained her bank account.
_	When the King of Iron Fist Tournament 2 was coming to an end, Jun comes to the realization that Kazuya's supernatural strength stems from Devil.
_	Bird taxonomy is currently in a state of flux, much wider in scope than the complications arising from the realization that birds are dinosaurs, and a full scientific consensus on the division of orders has yet to be settled upon.
_	This question forced the realization that musicianship was a ‘doorway to following the path to a higher calling.
_	After visiting the work of the Master’s in person during his European travels, Guffogg came to the realization that art is a language in itself as it can explain certain things words cannot.
_	This causes Jack to come to the realization that what he has done is negatively affecting his family.
_	Charlie finally comes to the realization that only one student is really being held against his will: a seeming "Big Man On Campus" named Ted Jones, who is harboring his own secrets.
_	By age 13, Grand had come to the realization that he was gay and struggled to gain acceptance of his sexuality within his Catholic family and faith.
_	Mizuguchi has suggested that the question is intended to provoke the realization that the player is "not a hacker but a sperm", that "Rez" is "the story of conception" set against an AI background, and that the awakening of the character of Eden is a reference to the theoretical technological singularity.
_	She spent two months before going back home upon the realization that the cloistered life - which she loved - was not for her; she went back home to discern the will of the Lord.
_	He argued that a reliance on whites would disempower the realization that many of these Africans had, that they had the power to overtake a society that had been taken from them.
_	Later in the day, Mickey goes to Eddie's house, but Mrs Lyons throws him out when she comes to the realization that he is Edward's separated twin.
_	Lee stated the song was inspired by and talked about her relationship with the band's fans, and the realization that following a music career "is what I'm supposed to do".
_	By the early 1920s the French Army had come to the realization that the armour-piercing capability of the 37 mm TRP infantry gun would be insufficient against modern tanks.
_	He became burned out on the business of photography while working there, coming to the realization that his real passion was music.
_	Anthropic arguments have recently been boosted by the realization that string theory has many solutions, or vacua, dubbed the string landscape, and by Steven Weinberg's prediction of the cosmological constant by anthropic reasoning.
_	In 1975, the former board of directors decided to end the implementation of child sponsorships due to the realization that while child sponsorships indeed raise the donation income, local children hardly benefit from them.
_	The main reason for seeking troopers of high caliber and for giving them higher ratings than are available in other military organizations was the realization that the Constabulary was only as good as the individual trooper.
_	Alas, the film ends with the realization that that is something he's not allowed to do.
_	Fifteen years later, during the 1936 Summer Olympics, the country came to the realization that its flag was identical to the flag of Haiti.
_	The women protest but, nevertheless, bond over the realization that the young songstress is in a closeted lesbian relationship.
_	FBI special agent Dale Cooper (Kyle MacLachlan) has been sent to the town to investigate and has come to the realization that the killer was the father of Laura, Leland Palmer (Ray Wise), who acted while possessed by a demonic entity—Killer BOB (Frank Silva).
_	Heavily influenced by repeat visits to Appalachian coal country and the realization that their three small regional railroads would face challenges surviving in the real world economy of the late 1970s, Koester suggested that the V&O, his Allegheny Midland and King's Virginia Midland form the Appalachian Lines.
_	Today in our networked, globalized environment we are more than ever coming to the realization that there is an interdisciplinary basis for understanding truth, and that each discrete branch of knowledge studies a mere subset of particularized knowledge streams” (B. Coates, 2012, p. 133.)
_	The Jewish leadership were faced with a resentful public, on one hand, and the realization that the cancellation of the visit would have dramatic import upon Jewish–Catholic relations.
_	He breaks up with Rachel, who angrily sings "Gives You Hell" in retaliation, and goes on a date with both Brittany and Santana, but comes to the realization that he does want to be with Rachel.
_	This has pedagogical implications in that the realization that assessment requires a fact-based regurgitation of received knowledge leads students to ignore discussions of the situations surrounding a design’s creation and reception and to focus instead on simple facts such as who designed what and when.
_	At the age of ten he successfully made gunpowder and came to the realization that an ignition could be caused by the mixing of certain nitrates and sulphuric acid.
_	Environmental education was born of the realization that solving complex local and global problems cannot be accomplished by politicians and experts alone, but requires "the support and active participation of an informed public in their various roles as consumers, voters, employers, and business and community leaders"
_	Upon reading this article, she came to the realization that Latina Greek organizations were a cultural median at universities.
_	Its key innovation was the realization that the instabilities that were causing the pinch to lose its plasma could be controlled.
_	This interest is likely due to the highly publicized AV development space, as well as the popularity of ridesourcing services and the realization that operating cost per mile of mobility services may substantially decrease compared to current prices, with automation.
_	Atmâ, Paramâtmâ, Brahmâ: the realization that the Self, "in relation to any being whatsoever, is in reality identical to Atmâ", constitutes the heart of the Hindu doctrine of "deliverance" or "moksha", and that doctrine is absolutely identical to what Islamic esoterism calls the "Supreme Identity" (that is to say, expressed in Hindu terms, the identity of Atmâ and Brahmâ):
_	The contents of the student organ dealt primarily not only on current issues but somehow on the realization that good attitude could be acquired through reading articles geared towards love for life, justice and truth; for all the beautiful things in the world particularly, nature.
_	At that point the joking stops and Kerr is faced with the realization that he is in need of serious help.
_	Later on, the discovery that the planet itself had been an artificial construction of the Ancients further served to solidify the realization that, if left unchecked, Vanu technology would forever and irrevocably change humanity and its future.
_	During the Panic of 1907, Andrew Freedman, a self-made millionaire, came to the realization that he almost lost his entire fortune.
_	Furious over the realization that the conspirators exploited his trust and plotted his son's death, he had Su Wen burned alive, Jiang Chong's immediate and extended family executed, and killed every official promoted for tracking down the Crown Prince.
_	From this shift in the locale of the training site and the realization that culture was an important factor in influencing group members (along with some other developments in the behavioral sciences) emerged the concept of organization development.
_	By 1947, Bing came to the realization that New York had revitalized her art.
_	They argue that following the realization that the centrally planned socialist systems could not effectively compete with capitalist economies, formerly Communist Party political elites are trying to engineer a limited form of economic liberalization that increases efficiency while still allowing them to maintain political control and power.
_	Drawing inspiration from his interest in young people, his concern for Special Olympics and the realization that the United Nations had proclaimed 1979 as the International Year of the Child, Tsereteli began his work.
_	With the assistance of Henry W. Olsen, Rho 98; Leroy G. Pulver, Pi 27; Perry McCandless, Alpha 384; and Abram Foster, Sigma 340, Todd and Torchia led the fraternity to the realization that while the fraternity was stable, stagnation was setting in.
_	Kevin then came to the realization that as he was finding difficulty missing a single show, he might as well contribute his time and talents to the band’s betterment.
_	Though heartbroken by the realization that she is married, he goes to meet the businessman.
_	It was the realization that relatively affluent white teenagers were listening to this music that led to the development of what was to be defined as rock and roll as a distinct genre.
_	The individual is then faced with the realization that perfection does not exist.
_	She then makes the realization that she will come out soon only to have another depressive episode (""And when I fall out of the sky, who'll be standing by"").
_	The first abstraction, which is shared by many animals, was probably that of numbers: the realization that a collection of two apples and a collection of two oranges (for example) have something in common, namely quantity of their members.
_	The owner of the nightclub, Malik (Marshall Manesh), shows interest in Kazaam upon the realization that he is a genie, and he hopes to control Kazaam through Max's father.
_	Ultimately, Lyotard describes the realization that he would not become any of these occupations as "fate" in his autobiography called "Peregrinations", published in 1986.
_	Despite his arrogant claims, he escaped in a fit of cowardice when X and Zero defeated him, bringing him to the realization that he could die.
_	The historical relevance of the Fundamental Theorem of Calculus is not the ability to calculate these operations, but the realization that the two seemingly distinct operations (calculation of geometric areas, and calculation of velocities) are actually closely related.
_	With the realization that the Seminoles were refusing to relocate to Indian Territory after the Treaty of Payne's Landing of 1832, Florida responded by raising a militia force.
_	This led to the realization that Archaen continental igneous rocks that plotted within the error of the CHUR line could instead lie on a depleted-mantle evolution line characterized by increasing Sm/Nd and Nd/Nd ratios over time.
_	A connecting thread is provided by Vancouver-based voice actor Ashleigh Ball... by the end Ball is touched by the realization that she's an integral part of something much larger than a kiddie show."
_	The idea that morality is facing its doom is generally coming, again, from postmodern European philosophy (see Nietzsche, Baudrillard, Heidegger) predicting the realization that meaning is being assigned by the institution not the individual.
_	After he is gone, she comes to the realization that she does love Jacob.
_	The adoption ban, he suggested, was the product of a desire “to create an additional lever” to hurt the U.S. after the realization that the prohibition of visits to Russia by U.S. officials was a non-starter, given that “not many [U.S.] officials travel to Russia.
_	He affirmed man's matter-spirit unity and the basic goodness of his nature, tempering this optimism with the realization that human nature has been weakened ("fractured") by sin, but not to an intrinsically corrupted and irreparable extent.
_	The war ended in 71 BC when, after a long and bitter fighting retreat before the legions of Crassus, and the realization that the legions of Gnaeus Pompeius Magnus and Marcus Terentius Varro Lucullus were moving in to entrap them, the armies of Spartacus launched their full strength against Crassus' legions and were utterly defeated.
_	However, he comes to the realization that he has "grown accustomed to her face."
_	"Broken Together", described as "Coldplay pop", is a piano ballad; the song's protagonist "smashes the facade of a fairy-tale relationship, forgoing the happy ending with the realization that 'maybe you and I were never meant to be complete'".
_	The name Omi-Ọṣun is attributed to the realization that the tributary feeds the Ọṣun River, as well as its subsequent dedication in ancient times to Ọṣun worship.
_	Perhaps they were reacting to the realization that we are all Fosca, we are all Giorgio, we are all Clara.
_	Hal then comes to the realization that, even though Nekron allowed the various resurrections of the heroes he transformed into Black Lanterns, it was they who chose to live again.
_	Tongue cannot express nor heart understand the full meaning of purgatory, which the soul willingly accepts as a mercy the realization that that suffering is of no importance compared to the removal of the impediment of sin."
_	News noted that Conrad "came to the realization that she had been replaced", and complimented the manner in which Cavallari was integrated into the series.
_	Subtly prompted by the old tribal chief Xumu, the 17-year-old Manuel suddenly came to the realization that the "Huni Kui" could search for rubber trees in the forest, cut them down to collect the 'sap' and so obtain the valuable trade good: latex ().
_	While appreciative of Thomas Krens' innovative museum direction, "The New York Times" mused that, "one can't help wondering which came first, the idea for the exhibition or the realization that money <nowiki>[from BMW]</nowiki> would be available for such a show."
_	Two breakthroughs came with the discovery of the FtsZ gene in 1980 and the realization that the FtsZ protein was localized to the division plane of dividing cells.
_	She seems to not be very concerned with the realization that Namu has defected and joined Mara and Abee.
_	She had trouble losing the additional baby weight and came upon the realization that everything she was drinking was sugary, unhealthy, and artificially sweetened.
_	After Laura professes her love for him, Paul reflects on his own feelings for her and eventually, in sessions with Gina, comes to the realization that he is in love with her.
_	Hitler came to the realization that Kahr sought to control him and was not ready to act against the government in Berlin.
_	A doctor proposes to marry Ambili, but she refuses because of the realization that his feeling are only based on sympathy.
_	These conflicts led to the realization that head-on conflict with Western nations was not a solution for Japan.
_	He understood that the universe doesn't care about our existence or welfare and he epitomized the realization that our lives have meaning only to the extent that we give them meaning."
_	Sometimes the advent of the realization that one is an abductee can cause a "flood" of previously hidden memories of one's perceived encounters with "the entities."
_	The changed perspective of world politics after 9/11, the violence of the unfair Iraq war and the realization that mothers were the main victims of the war led to Jolly's work on the female reproductive system and on the topic of motherhood; the senselessness of bringing new life into a world made unfit for living and women's lack of choice in the matter prompted her to work on the embryo.
_	We are a revolutionary group of men and women formed with the realization that complete sexual liberation for all people cannot come about unless existing social institutions are abolished.
_	That night at Danny's home Missy tells him that when Carol was born she came to the realization that she lived her whole life in denial of her feelings for Danny and that she's not afraid of those feelings anymore.
_	At her relatives' home, Stella reconciles with them and comes to the realization that while there will be sadness and pain in the world, there are also joy and happiness that follows it.
_	The euphoria of a successful season gave way to the realization that the military demands of the American participation in World War II would put the continued success of the AFL (and the NFL, for that matter) into question.
_	Marilyn comes to the realization that Jessica may truly be possessed and tries to take the doll from her daughter.
_	This suicidal desire was fueled by the realization that his life had become an empty shell due to the secrets he kept, knowing his father's true nature.
_	Posing as Viki, Niki divorces Clint; Viki later overcomes her illness with the realization that it had actually been triggered by her witnessing Victor and Irene in bed many years before.
_	His most recent cloudy though brought him to the realization that Bethany was in danger.
_	What shocked and dismayed the American public was the realization that either it had been lied to or that the American military command had been dangerously overoptimistic in its appraisal of the situation in Vietnam.
_	The devastating collapse of the Interchurch World Movement due to lack of financial support shocked American Protestant leaders into the realization that a new era had arrived.
_	This religious depression, in force well before the great economic depression of the era, was grounded in the realization that American Protestantism could no longer identify itself with American culture and civilization.
_	In an interview with Just So You Know, Gaskarth said the album title "summarizes the theme of the songs, most of which centralize around escapism; running from my problems, burning bridges because of those problems; and the realization that its hard work to rebuild after those problems have torn people apart."
_	Primitivists see deep ecology's appreciation for the richness and diversity of life as contributing to the realization that present human interference with the non-human world is coercive and excessive.
_	Due to the realization that coniferous forests naturally regenerate only with difficulty, the planting of conifer seeds was successfully attempted in the Middle Ages.
_	The understanding that goodness and being are interchangeable leads to the realization that God is goodness.
_	Nothing is more startling though for Cullen and the people of Lily, Arkansas than the realization that Cullen's sensitive, gifted fifteen-year-old brother Gabriel has suddenly and inexplicably disappeared.
_	The Orthodox celebrate this day with joy, but with the realization that very sad events are soon to come.
_	The discovery of a suitably rigorous definition of the real numbers – indeed, the realization that a better definition was needed – was one of the most important developments of 19th-century mathematics.
_	On the Moon, Cyclops comes to the realization that he will need Emma Frost's power as well in order to defeat Hope.
_	In computer science applications, this is known as currying; it has led to the realization that simply-typed lambda calculus can be interpreted in any Cartesian closed category.
_	FBI special agent Dale Cooper (Kyle MacLachlan) has been sent to the town to investigate and has come to the realization that the killer was the father of Laura, Leland Palmer (Ray Wise), who acted while possessed by a demonic entity—Killer BOB (Frank Silva).
_	Luce broke with the Progressive Labor Movement in 1965 over its rigid structure and harsh discipline, coming to the realization that they weren’t talking about liberty for anyone, and that the PLM leaders were instead saying:
_	Entitled "What Really Happened in Nanking: The Refutation of a Common Myth", Tanaka stated in his introduction "I am convinced that [American researchers] will arrive at the realization that violations of international law of the magnitude alleged by Iris Chang in "The Rape of Nanking" (more than 300,000 murders and 80,000 rapes) never took place."
_	To her surprise, as the tour progressed, she came to the realization that what she was writing was a book.
_	Her romantic relationships with fellow members Puck and Sam are followed by the realization that she is in love with her best friend Brittany.
_	Over time, the curriculum of Master of Public Policy and the Master of Public Administration (MPA) degrees have tended to overlap in many areas, due to the realization that policy analysis and program evaluation could benefit from an understanding of public administration, and vice versa.
_	At the time of the narrative he is living in Florence Italy and has lost all contact with Saul, and only indirectly comes to the realization that Saul has not only disappeared into the Peruvian jungle but has become the tribal storyteller of the Machiguengas.
_	The most important distinction is the realization that the hallucinations are not real.
_	If the review produces the realization that there are no disputed facts and that the issue of contention is a matter of law, he may offer summary judgment before the trial.
_	Bemis took piano lessons which he credits for the realization that he wanted to make music.
_	I came to the realization that we had been thrust into the forefront of a movement to liberate oppressed people, not only in Montgomery but also throughout our country, and this movement had worldwide implications.
_	The Brazilian football community came the realization that it was necessary to slightly change the style of play.
_	With the realization that he needed more education than grammar school had provided, he announced to his parents that he would be enrolling in some local college classes.
_	In light of the realization that the Intersect's interactions with Chuck's dreams proved correct, Dreyfus cleared Chuck for return to duty.
_	When she woke up after being in a coma, she could not remember anything and came to the realization that she lost her memories.
_	He smiles at the realization that Gabriel was the one who kissed him.
_	Pickering has often considered his teaching style purely purposeless and impulsive, and he criticizes those who have subsequently asked him about his philosophy on education, responding that people, regarding such large social questions, have trouble with "the realization that mostly it's all meaningless.
_	After his mother is paralyzed under mysterious circumstances, Andrew's father realizes something is peculiar about his son, eventually coming to the realization that Andrew is the son of Lucifer.
_	This, coupled with the realization that he was more interested in writing than art, led Lethem to drop out halfway through his sophomore year.
_	This led to the realization that visual or retinal error (the difference between the post-saccadic point of regard and the target position) played a role in the homeostatic regulation of saccade amplitude.
_	Turtle's powers return with the realization that it was his own telekinesis that destroyed the sinking shell in a desperate bid to save his life.
_	In going the wrong way, Smithy nonetheless achieved positive results and invited comparisons that eventually led to the realization that commissurotomy was the operation of choice... his work, well publicized at the time, encouraged patients and physicians and prompted the concept that operative treatment of valvular heart disease could be successful."
_	If the absurd experience is truly the realization that the universe is fundamentally devoid of absolutes, then we as individuals are truly free.
_	However, after attending a tradeshow in Germany where he tested out the Canada Goose brand (in Europe, products were branded as Canada Goose because Snow Goose was already a registered name), his passion for the business was ignited by the realization that Canada Goose was a real brand with real meaning to consumers.
_	Todd McCarthy of "The Hollywood Reporter" found the film's conclusion and the characters distasteful, writing: "unfortunately, then, the film ends on a flat, unimpressive note, as well as with the realization that, no matter how much time we've spent with them, the characters remain utterly one-dimensional", but went on by saying, "technically and logistically, Greengrass delivers everything you expect from him; there's no one better when it comes to staging complex, chaotic action amid the real life of big cities.
_	After the gang assaults him and further threatens sexual assault, both of which he decides against reporting, he comes to the realization that he has to follow the recommendation of fellow inmates Butcher (Dennis Burkley) and Virgil Cane (F. Murray Abraham) of needing to "take care of his problem."
_	After leaving the ceremony in a huff and arriving home, Batman comes to the realization that he doesn't have any real friends, and fires his loyal butler Alfred after he discovers that he was pretending to be Lucius Fox.
_	They soon came to the realization that they could be successful as duo music writers and producers for others as well, and began pursuing that goal.
_	He soon came to the realization that he had overplayed his hand in his attacks against the agrarian fascists, and finding himself in the minority, he resigned his position as the leader of fascism.
_	Critic Mike Marqusee has written that this composition is "surely a Dylan cameo", and that its full poignancy becomes apparent upon the realization that "it is sung, at least in part, to the singer himself: he's the one 'with no direction home'."
_	After a time Batman comes to the realization that he needs The Monolith to find The Incinerator.
_	Pliny the Elder credited the realization that they were a single object to Pythagoras in the sixth century BCE, while Diogenes Laertius argued that Parmenides was probably responsible.
_	In the face of their blindness toward the true criminals, the realization that covetousness drove a wedge in their relationship, and the absurdity of their loss, the brothers are reconciled in laughter.
_	The profound confusion caused by this—by the realization that the law is not infallible, that he himself is not irreproachable, and that there exists a superior force (identified by Hugo with God) to what he has known—plunges him into a despair in which he feels himself "demolished".
_	After just one year at Williams College (he entered with sophomore standing), he hoped to transfer to Yale, but a talk with his father led to the realization that family finances would not support it.
_	In this regard, the reviewers came to the realization that Hoffmann merely saw the children as simple sacrifices, and that he was attested for a "massive lack of emotionality and compassion".
_	Under constant scrutiny, Abby struggles with the realization that she may know too much for her own good - especially once she realizes that her own life is in jeopardy.
_	"We were favorably impressed (with Diệm) but only in the realization that we are prepared to accept the seemingly ridiculous prospect that this Yogi-like mystic could assume the charge he is apparently about to undertake only because the standard set by his predecessors is so low."
_	However, he eventually becomes irritated after being kept awake by the constant screaming of Katsuro (who, as the front part of the centipede, has his mouth free and is still able to speak) and the realization that Jenny is dying from septicemia.
_	That shock came with the realization that federal prohibition went much farther in the direction of banning personal consumption than all local prohibition ordinances and many state prohibition statutes.
_	However, after difficulties with the C-76 (including a crash of a production model in mid-1943), as well as the realization that sufficient quantities of aluminum aircraft alloys would be available for war production, plans for large-scale C-76 production were rejected.
_	"Hoare later came to the realization that in the days after the murder, Russian "rightists" had been trying to frame the British for the crime, and him, in particular.
_	In counting it, Reynolds realizes that it is far more than they were told, and is dumbstruck with the realization that they are now rich.
_	With the dawn came the realization that he was in the company of 4th Division.
_	It was the realization that data issues lay behind much of the damage done by these international financial crises that led to the creation of international data quality standards, such as the International Monetary Fund (IMF) General Data Dissemination System (GDDS).
_	Compared to the original design, in which Lincoln’s hand seems to awaken the slave to his new freedom and to the realization that his shackles are gone, the current memorial is more of an amalgamation of approaches.
_	Despite the realization that she was best suited to comedies, Lombard completed one more drama: "They Knew What They Wanted" (1940), co-starring Charles Laughton, which was mildly successful.
_	The first step is the realization that classical mechanics and Newton's law of gravity admit a geometric description.
_	This led to the field of statistical mechanics and the realization that gases undergo irreversible processes.
_	They arrive, usually with the realization that they have died, and become members of the community there in ways similar to when they were alive.
_	One of the important developments in materials science in the 1970s and the 1980s was the realization that statistical field theory, similar to quantum field theory, could be used to provide a microscopic theory of universality .
_	Erin Coulehan from the website "Salon", was very positive towards the clip noting how the kaleidoscopic effects showcased the "ever-revolving feelings of confusion, frustration and eventual solace" a person goes through after the realization that their partner is going on with their life with another love interest, something described in the song's lyrics.
_	This move shocked her father who believed it was nothing more than a mere visit and relented to his daughter's wishes upon the realization that it was fundamental to her.
_	Sisko comes to the realization that he has been grieving over the loss of his wife—literally "living in the past"—and explains this to the wormhole aliens.
_	The reason for the GRID-to-AIDS change in nomenclature was the realization that the "gay" attribution did not fully encompass the demographics of the disease.
_	By 1940, the 23-year-old Camp Ord was expanded to , with the realization that the two-year-old conflict of World War II could soon cross the Atlantic Ocean to involve America.
_	Anhalt immediately heard the influence of Bach on the piece, and at that moment he had the realization that he wanted to be a composer as well.
_	What has brought this field into being is the realization that technology alone cannot rescue the planet from processes like global warming, ocean acidification and species extinction.
_	Over the course of eleven subsequent lifetimes, the woman experiences life from every conceivable vantage point as her soul evolves, thereby allowing the maturity and eventual letting-go of her ego which in turn enables the realization that the man was, and always has been, her father spirit.
_	It is eventually revealed that Rei is a vessel for the soul of Lilith, and was created specifically by Gendo to be used as a tool for accomplishing instrumentality; she is a clone made from the salvaged genes of Yui and is plagued by a sense of negative self-worth stemming from the realization that she is an expendable asset.
_	The report included several uses of OPM to model existing SC5 standards and led to an initial motivation for the standardization of OPM with the realization that being text-based, ISO standards are prone to suffer from inconsistencies and incomplete information.
_	Much to their surprise Bruce seems unhappy and he reveals the realization that Mr. B was his childhood hero Ernie Brown.
_	While I have performed my job as mayor, in my opinion, as a very conservative, progressive individual -- and still continue to be a very conservative individual -- I think that it is important that I discuss the struggles I have had over the last few years when I came to the realization that I am gay.
_	Much to his surprise, Brian has a good time living with Jillian, but he comes to the realization that there is no way he can pay the rent by himself and he decides to allow Stewie to move in with them, who now makes money with his own paper route.
_	Soon growing bored with this, he comes to the realization that his constant fear of fatal illness was the one thing which gave him any interest in life.
_	A key finding of this study was the realization that while design and technological factors could reduce costs of a new manned space transportation system, further significant savings would be possible only if a new operations philosophy were adopted which treated PLS in a manner similar to an operational airliner rather than a research and development space vehicle.
_	The shock of Adowa exceeded the British shock at Isandhlwana, with both disasters magnified by the realization that indigenous forces had beaten modern European regulars in the open field.
_	In addition, Logan and Veronica's relationship becomes even more tumultuous, with Logan eventually coming to the realization that they need to break up.
_	Rempel also reports that a large percentage of the boys who served in the HJ slowly came to the realization that "they had worked and slaved for a criminal cause", which they carried for a lifetime; some of them recalled a "loss of freedom" and claimed their time in the HJ "had robbed them of a normal childhood."
_	In the late 1980s, the Community came to the realization that their humanitarian efforts in Mozambique, then torn by the Mozambican Civil War, could not succeed without peace.
_	Paris–Nice optimistic for results, but with the realization that the stage 6 individual time trial would limit any chances he had on the overall crown.
_	A key finding of the survey was the realization that many crimes were not reported to the police.
_	Overcome by the realization that he, too, has lived a selfish life, Luc agrees to join the driver's secret society.
_	This event shocks her into the realization that she has become a danger, and she chooses to be bronzed to prevent any further damage.
_	Particularly damaging to their cause was the deterrent effect of the massacre, as well as the realization that no Sunni uprisings had occurred in the rest of the country in support of the Hama rebels.
_	The official British history, "The War Against Japan", also writes the Soviet declaration of war "brought home to all members of the Supreme Council the realization that the last hope of a negotiated peace had gone and there was no alternative but to accept the Allied terms sooner or later".
_	Tom, who, among other things, learned that Margo had lied about being at work one night, suddenly saw Margo's odd behavior in a whole new fashion and came to the realization that she was having an affair with Doc Reese.
_	The nondualistic traditions such as Adi Shankara's Advaita Vedanta tradition of Hinduism champion a monistic premise, asserting that the individual human soul and Brahman are identical, only ignorance, impulsiveness and inertia leads to suffering through Saṃsāra, in reality they are no dualities, meditation and self-knowledge is the path to liberation, the realization that one's soul is identical to Brahman is moksha, and spiritual liberation is achievable in this life ("jivanmukti").
_	Rainwater harvesting has become significant in view of the realization that water has become scarce and it is becoming a critical problem globally.
_	It is now that she comes to the realization that it wasn't Sam who killed her child but the clown and that her memory was wrong.
_	Eventually, when the Sarvants come to the realization that men are intelligent, they release their captives.
_	Their ambition is to turn the tables and lead abused women away from the circle of silence, shame and asphyxia, and towards self acceptance and the realization that they are allowed to continue to live.
_	While Garnet queries his staff about ordering an easy mission for the next day, he comes to the realization that Dennis hated every minute of his duties.
_	As time went by, the Spanish authorities came to the realization that the dialogue was strictly with Belbachir.
_	The two teachers were sharing a classroom and teaching at opposite sides, when they came to the realization that this way of teaching was highly productive for students.
_	The album contains numerous love songs, with "Magnolia Street", a song about the realization that one is in love, gaining some radio airplay.
_	Wonder Woman and Batman come to the realization that Superman's mutation can be controlled through willpower.
_	He comes to the realization that his job and his wife receive all of his benefits, leaving him penniless.
_	"125 Magazine"s founding partners and the core editorial team are photographers Perry Curties and Jason Joyce, and art directors Rob Crane and Martin Yates who started "125" in 2003 after the realization that no unbiased platform for new work by both established and emerging talent existed.
_	However, he said he believed that individuals would come to the realization that "equal liberty" and "occupancy and use" doctrines were "generally trustworthy guiding principle of action," and, as a result, they would likely find it in their interests to contract with each other to refrain from infringing upon equal liberty and from protecting land that was not in use.
_	During a craft fair, McGuire came to the realization that there was a market for pre-made polymer clay canes and decided to go into product development.
_	When he was about ten years old, the Emancipation Proclamation of 1863 brought about the realization that he was a slave.
_	In her childhood she read the autobiographical account that Saint Thérèse of Lisieux had written and the experience had a profound effect on her pious and innocent character while also coming to the realization that she wanted to live for God alone.
_	In the spring of 1993, he came to the realization that Fantagraphics published almost all of his favorite comics.
_	In 1999, research by David Sandeman led to the realization that bee inebriation models are potentially valuable for understanding vertebrate and even human ethanol intoxication:
_	Nevertheless, Blalock excelled in surgical courses while he was a student at Hopkins, and this made him come to the realization that he wanted to be a surgeon.
_	The Siddhi that she provides is the realization that only she exists.
_	Similarly to OCB, this concept emerged in response to the realization that only looking at job specific work behaviors ignored a significant portion of the job domain.
_	Both of them come to the realization that it would be a good time to leave the battle.
_	He gets half a block before he stops and comes to the realization that what he's experiencing is nothing more than a dream.
_	As Watson explains his insights, he slowly comes to the realization that Jory could not have executed the murder on his own and that, at the very least, everyone in the family knew of it and was lying for him.
_	The House initiated impeachment in late 1804, and the Senate tried but acquitted him, partially on the realization that while Chase's actions had been reprehensible, it was more important to preserve an independent judiciary.
_	This result led to the realization that Martin-Löf's original 1971 type theory was inconsistent as it allowed the same "Type in Type" behaviour that Girard's paradox exploits.
_	Developed to bring about worker control of the means of production by direct action, the intellectuals of syndicalism came to the realization that Italy’s primitive economy could facilitate neither equality nor abundance for society.
_	"Los Angeles Times" Gina McIntyre notes in her review of "Nebraska" that the episode opens with "Rick and the others paralyzed by the realization that Sophia is not only beyond saving, but that she's been nearby the whole time".
_	At the same time, linguists have begun to come to the realization that creole languages are in no way inferior to other languages.
_	They must come to terms with the workings of the ship, the dangers faced by their ship, the realization that they are clones, and their ultimate destiny to save their race.
_	When all of the other members started losing interest in "Hasch Boys," it left Håstad, Sherman and Gud coming to the realization that they were the only active members.
_	After the realization that Warblade had not been lying at all, and had been trying to help him the entire time, they became friends and allies.
_	In an interview, Lacey stated that he had the realization that he no longer wished to be associated with many of the people and bands he'd met over the past years with Brand New, and he also felt as though he had no friends.
_	Its discovery heralded the realization that carnivorous dinosaurs were bipeds, unlike the lizardlike megalosaurs sculpted for the Crystal Palace.
_	House to go speed dating along with Chase, who becomes conflicted with the realization that women date him for his looks.
_	It originated with the realization that gender and trade issues have not been accorded their due importance by researchers and advocacy groups alike.
_	It's because of this she comes to the realization that she's good at parties and having fun.
_	The resulting renewed interest in new forms lead to the discovery of further exotic allotropes, including glassy carbon, and the realization that "amorphous carbon" is not strictly amorphous.
_	After she manages to say ""Mennen Tullen" "(which the inebriated Mats kept repeating as he doused Friman), Mats comes to the realization that for years he had believed that his hallucinations were how the events actually turned out: a happy get-together at the Z-Salamapartio headquarters with champagne and a job-offer for the disgruntled Friman.
_	In June 2017, Fafara explained that he would start performing Coal Chamber songs with DevilDriver, coming to the realization that Coal Chamber would probably never tour or make music ever again.
_	Pinky gets out her diary, and she comes to the realization that Pinky is the killer.
_	However, upon the realization that they attend the same college, they became friends.
_	The British government drastically changed their mindset after the Black Week disaster to the realization that the Boer war would not be an easy victory or won by Christmas.
_	In practically all his works Stanković presents strong characters who are at the same time victims of a strange weakness stemming from the realization that their time has irrevocably passed.
_	Ada must now face the realization that her beloved Niles is disturbed and criminally insane.
_	Carlo Santos of Anime News Network wrote that the franchise "in a way, [...] reflects the malaise of a generation: the realization that old, rich, powerful people have screwed up the world and that the young are helpless to do anything about it".
_	As the realization that the Seminoles would resist relocation sank in, Florida began preparing for war.
_	The two older men begin to talk about their pasts and come to the realization that not only is Daemon Sōnosuke's true father, but Kōbei is in fact Kozō's true father.
_	The discovery of mammalian sperm chemotaxis and the realization that it can guide spermatozoa for short distances only, estimated at the order of millimeters, triggered a search for potential long-range guidance mechanisms.
_	When she visits her real family, who are being bugged as well, she comes to the realization that she cannot return to her old life.
_	In perhaps not dissimilar vein, she wrote in 1954 that 'With due respect for the necessary strictest handling and interpretation of the transference, I feel still that we should leave room somewhere for the realization that analyst and patient are also two real people, of equal adult status, in a real personal relationship to each other'.
_	The key to effective cross-examination is the realization that true cross-examination is the cross-examiner testifying and the witness agreeing or adopting the facts of the question.
_	With the realization that an n-level system can be broken down into a collection of two-level systems with varying probabilities, standard percolation algorithms can be used to find the retention as simply the total number of sites at the lower level minus the draining regions (clusters of low-level sites touching the boundary).
_	Feeling guilty upon the realization that he has been stealing others'
_	The trial program, which consisted of 5 prototypes of class E 10.0, resulted in the realization that a single uniform type of electric locomotive was not sufficient to cover all needs.
_	Impetus for the Bamako Convention arose from the failure of the Basel Convention to prohibit trade of hazardous waste to less developed countries (LDCs), and from the realization that many developed nations were exporting toxic wastes to Africa.
_	Around this time, in 1968, the Association of Black Psychologists (ABP) was founded, and its members came “to the realization that they are Black people first and psychologists second.
_	The concept of creating reserved parks emerged in the 1980s with the realization that wild roaming elephants which moved freely in the entire region of the three parks needed to be protected from poachers and the logging industry.
_	This is directly after the realization that she is the granddaughter of the man who received the final transmission from the Nazi submarine that Adler is looking for, and that the fractal in the music box leads to.
_	This discovery came after the realization that bacteria possess proteins that are homologous to tubulin and actin; the main components of the eukaryotic cytoskeleton.
_	In 1955 he wrote, "The only solution appears to be a drastic weeding out of the list, in the realization that quality is at least as important as quantity...
_	This agitation led to the realization that people had to be properly organized and, as a result, a district Indian National Congress Committee was formed.
_	Some in attendance initially believed the shooting was part of the act, but as Gale continued shooting, the audience quickly came to the realization that the event was not staged.
_	The definition of the word is "expressing frustration at the realization that things have turned out badly or not as planned, or that one has just said or done something foolish".
_	This opens up the realization that there is one real Texar and one who is not, and the search continues now, not only for Dy and Zermah, but for the answer to this mystery.
_	What shocked and dismayed the American public was the realization that either it had been lied to or that the American military command had been dangerously overoptimistic in its appraisal of the situation in Vietnam.
_	This includes measures such as autologous donation before elective surgery, the infusion of shed blood, and the realization that in many patients normovolemic anemia is not an indication for transfusion.
_	A landscape painting trip to Cooper Union's Green Camp in rural New Jersey, brought him to the realization that he could pursue painting, rather than cartooning, as a career.
_	Whereas economics formerly focused largely on utility in terms of a person's preferences (decision utility), the realization that forecasts are often inaccurate suggests that measuring preferences at a time of choice may be an incomplete concept of utility.
_	Probably, the first requirement was the realization that oil wells, or water wells, are not necessarily vertical.
_	Frequently taunts GGG over their inferiority and inability to match the Sol Masters, but is visibly shocked whenever the heroes manage to fight back - this culminates in the realization that she has been outmaneuvered at last when Genesic GaoGaiGar attacks Pisa Sol directly.
_	PopMatters also said the song was a highlight, stating that "Perhaps most satisfying of all of it is the realization that [it] is as wrenching a song as she’s ever written, so quiet in its despair, but so clear at the same time".
_	Once Marina forces the realization that she is no longer the Cherish he knew upon him, Rue agrees to heal Tobin, his rival, for her.
_	On the second track "You Still Believe in Me", "One of the high points of the composition and Brian's vocal performance ... is the snaky, though generally descending melodic line on the line 'I want to cry,' his response to the realization that his girlfriend still believes in him despite his past failures."
_	In 2008, the stress got the best of him and Jan came to the realization that he had to make some radical changes in his life
_	But what makes the Showrounds so special to the current generation of supporters is the realization that it was nearly lost to the club.
_	He describes himself as becoming physically ill from the realization that he had little idea how he really played the cello from a technical standpoint.
_	Aikens pointed out that although this stratum was not continuous over most of the excavation, it was important because it led to the realization that there was a partial gap in the stratigraphic record.
_	A mere four months later Atassi resigned after coming to the realization that restoration of the UAR was not a party priority.
_	Rather, he writes that "both sides were dismayed, the whites by the realization that the enemy really would attack a town, the Indians by their first experience with exploding shells rather than cannonballs."
_	The family were particularly disgusted by the realization that Potter's body had been allowed to remain in the truck, with windows and doors closed, not only for the rest of the winter but throughout the summer.
_	As Donkey attempts to distract her, he comes to the realization that Dragon is female, and successfully manages to charm his way past her.
_	Numerous plans for purchasing Amiga and salvaging the technology came and went after Commodore's demise; all of them including the realization that for the Amiga to stay competitive, the development and release of AAA or Hombre would have to be one of their overriding goals.
_	Ian finally comes to the realization that his wife has been dead for quite some time, but believes that it could have been the journey to the hospital that truly finished her off.
_	Calderone came to the realization that sexuality did not just equate genitality, and that sex education was sorely lacking from American society.
_	Partisan Review's mission, Trilling writes, is to "organize a union" between political ideas and the imagination by insisting on the realization that "unless we insist that politics is imagination and mind, we will learn that imagination and mind are politics and of the kind that we will not like."
_	After the Yankees lost the series in Game 5, he cut short a postgame interview when he teared up, coming to the realization that it could have been his final game as a Yankee.
_	In late 2015, Cox announced that 2016 will be his last year hosting a summer residency at Space Ibiza, as the club was closing and he came to the realization that Ibiza isn't the same as it used to be.
_	Due to issues of writer's block and being unable to focus various elements of his music together, he came to the realization that he needed help in the form of members of a band.
_	Stella comes to the realization that the cancer that she's known she has, and kept to herself, is in its final stages when she starts seeing the deceased residents of Goat Island.
_	Following his victory, Linus goes to the principal with the intention of keeping his campaign promises and laying down the law, only to be taken aback with the realization that he is still strictly subordinate to the faculty and in fact, like most student government positions, has no real power.
_	They are having to cope with the culture shock of awakening in a distant future with the realization that everything they knew and had are now gone.
_	An outgrowth of Jackson's trip was the realization that the National Park Service does not represent the underlying issue of slavery contextually in its battlefield displays and presentations.
_	Criticism of this system began in the latter half of the 19th century, with the realization that many organisms met the criteria for inclusion among both plants and animals.
_	This device of “call for submissions” has been based on the realization that the view of one person is limited.
_	McFarland, horrified at the realization that his men may have lost their colors, was about to reply when a gust of wind flung the flag out.
_	Byrd said that "the realization that rock was an access to a larger public came out of that concert, and the idea of forming a band began taking shape."
_	His business plan was based on the realization that Wall Street (and the financial community generally) was willing to pay for high-quality business information, delivered as quickly as possible and in as many usable forms possible, via technology (e.g., graphs of highly specific trends).
_	Alphonso looked around in the realization that he cannot tear himself away from Mahé and the river to which he belonged.
_	As peace returns to the Mushroom Kingdom and all the Rabbids are restored to normal, Beep-O comes to the realization that F.B. is actually his future self and uses the Time Washing Machine to help his past comrades.
_	Since the realization that performance goal orientation is best split into two separate parts, researchers have conducted validation studies to demonstrate the statistical and conceptual distinction of these three dimensions to goal orientation.
_	In view of the humiliation of Chōshū forces against the Western powers, Takasugi had come to the realization that direct confrontation with the foreigners was not an option.
_	(i.e. a certain concrete realization of a Hilbert space and associated operators reproducing the correct loop algebra – the realization that everybody was using) have been given by two groups (Lewandowski, Okolow, Sahlmann and Thiemann) and (Christian Fleischhack).
_	The law is named after Douglas Engelbart, whose work in augmenting human performance was explicitly based on the realization that although we make use of technology,
_	Fear of additional airstrikes and the realization that the war was lost prompted many of the rebel officers to consider surrendering to the federals or fleeing into the United States, to avoid punishment by the Mexican government.
_	It was the realization that the fury of the first 50 meters in the Rome Olympics was not accidental.
_	Ben hysterically comes to the realization that Isabella is possessed.
_	The opera concludes with the realization that all of the events have only occurred within Conrad's own fevered mind.
_	It recommends the practice of observation to counteract this, i.e., the observation of other beings, the self, and the mind, which results in the realization that none of these really exists.
_	In this work he comes to the realization that what pushes man to participate in the violence of war is not the protection of the abstract notion of a nation, but rather the concrete idea which is direct protection of his comrades in the battlefield and the indirect protection of their loved ones at home.
_	The last three decades have seen a proliferation of subfamily names, as a result of three factors: (1) the realization that some subfamilies were assemblages of unrelated taxa; (2) abandonment of paraphyletic taxa, and (3) the discovery of novel fossil taxa.
_	In his very first class, he made the realization that the only thing that had been preventing him from doing any artistic type of painting was simply getting permission to do it.
_	The Queen, possibly irritated by the sallies of the republicans, the tendency to democracy, and the realization that her influence was manifestly on the decline, was urging the move.
_	Alvarez wrote "Coolidge", which deals with a failed relationship and the realization that "I'm not a cool guy anymore, as if I ever was before".
_	Allen, whether motivated by patriotic impulses (as he describes in his account of the events), or by the realization that the action might improve the political position of his side in the grants disputes, agreed to help, and began rounding up the Green Mountain Boys.
_	Prout claims this requirement does not express xenophobic feelings, it solely claims to be the realization that there should not be a constant outflow of local capital, where natural resources are explored by foreign investment companies that extract assets and money out of the community.
_	With the realization that food was the key to survival, transport became a secondary worry and walking, hitch-hiking, and carpooling became the norm.
_	The essential feature of the morality built upon the basis of Hartmann's philosophy is the realization that all is one and that, while every attempt to gain happiness is illusory, yet before deliverance is possible, all forms of the illusion must appear and be tried to the utmost.
_	The movement of third-wave feminism is said to have arisen out of the realization that women are of many colors, ethnicities, nationalities, religions and cultural backgrounds.
_	He discovers that the town is deserted except for a handful of corpses and comes to the realization that the country has been subjected to an attack.
_	She came to the realization that as she and her fans were growing up, and it was time for her to move away from the teen appeal to wider audiences, and en-cash on the longevity of the album market.
_	This song reflects the realization that I am God's creation and His design never fails.
_	Eventually they come to the realization that each is exactly the person the other one needs for fulfillment.
_	He is also mentioned in "The Big S.T.A.N.K", where he was the reason that S.T.A.N.K was created, to lure him to the toilet-shaped stink bomb, but the project was abandoned with the realization that dolphins don't use toilets.
_	In 1981, Carther came to the realization that he did not need lead at all, that if he worked with thicker ¾ inch plate glass, he could carve deeply into glass with abrasive blast and not compromise the structural capabilities of the glass, allowing him to work at almost any scale.
_	The mere fact that they survived such inhumane treatment and managed to exist today brought them to the realization that their culture is threatened.
_	He and a group of others left Midway (which Williams had purchased in 1988) to experiment with VR, but disappointingly came to the realization that VR headsets were not catching on.
_	A review in JAMA (the Journal of the American Medical Association) by researchers with the Harvard School of Public Health advised that “Some of the "health" advice contained in this book would be humorous if it was not so dangerous” and that “Potential readers of this ridiculous book would be wiser to take only the antacids—as we felt the urge to do after the realization that we had spent $22.50 on an unscientific, impractical, and potentially dangerous health fraud that literally made us ill.”
_	When he awoke, the Yellow Emperor came to the realization that the Way could not be achieved through the passions.
_	In the remake, after the betrayal and the realization that her jealousy of Anna Knutzhorn was unfounded, she unsuccessfully attempts to join him.
_	On November 17, 2015, Jindal appeared on "Special Report with Bret Baier" on the Fox News Channel, announcing that he was ending his run for president, saying "I've come to the realization that this is not my time."
_	He then makes the realization that he killed Yeonhee's boyfriend.
_	The reappearance of certain themes, time and again, in different mythologies, leads to the realization that these themes portray universal and eternal truths about mankind.
_	Veska is shaken by the realization that humans have constructed and flown the ship, which is considerably more advanced than the primitive level of invention on his own planet.
_	Prior to the realization that individual enzymes were capable of such a task, it was believed that two or more enzymes enacted functional group transfers.
_	This was done in hopes that the "robberies and depredations" upon the citizens would cease, and under the realization that the transfer was inevitable.
_	Other factors such as the Bolshevik Revolution the previous year and the realization that capital profited immensely from the First World War while workers were cannon fodder fuelled the belief that labour deserved more than what employers were voluntarily willing to give.
_	In July 1991, Lisa Frankenberg and Kent Hawryluk, two employees of "Prognosis", an English-language monthly newspaper in Prague which began publication in March 1991, came to the realization that there was a ripe market in the then Czechoslovakia for a weekly broadsheet newspaper.
_	When it came to deciding equality of two individuals to determine if two individuals that were to be married were equally matched, Ibn Abidin came to the realization that occupations were not considered of the same status in all locations.
_	Kristin comes to the realization that she deserves to win, and she claims that she was afraid to express this for fear of getting the dream pulled away from her.
_	Major-General Henning von Tresckow, one of the primary conspirators in the July 20 plot to assassinate Adolf Hitler, famously referred to the "Robe of Nessus" following the realization that the assassination plot had failed and that he and others involved in the conspiracy would lose their lives as a result:
_	The sight of Cape Noir evokes the realization that their longitude reckoning is grossly in error.
_	The original integer index was split into an integer-operation and a memory-operation index, as suggested by Andrew D. Balsa, reflecting the realization that memory management is important in CPU design.
_	O'Donnell converted to Catholicism on his deathbed, perhaps due to the realization that he might not be allowed to be buried in his church.
_	The two thus come to the realization that, although the robots themselves were consciously unaware of doing so, they'd been following the First and Second Laws all along.
_	Around 1960 the discovery of Trisomy 21 led to the realization that genetics could be used to predict phenotype(s).
_	The challenges of transition led her to the realization that she should become an activist for the transgender community.
_	The next day, Robert comes to the realization that during an earlier escape, Daryl had been tagged with a tracking transmitter and that the Russians have been homing in on them ever since.
_	Emboldened by the realization that the ghost is in fact the caretaker of the castle, who has been living there rent free, they return along with Hylton and Kirkwood.
_	In the Season 9 premiere, Turk tells J.D. that the day after he left Sacred Heart, the Janitor asked when J.D. was returning, either oblivious to, or in denial of, J.D.'s departure, and upon coming to the realization that J.D. no longer worked at Sacred Heart, promptly walked off the job and quit.
_	"Professor Bernhardi", a play about a Jewish doctor who turns away a Catholic priest in order to spare a patient the realization that she is on the point of death, is his only major dramatic work without a sexual theme.
_	After the realization that endogenous synthesis was an important contribution to VLCFA in the body, efforts at dietary therapy shifted to inhibiting these synthetic pathways in the body.
_	The latest work of Boedo has been focused on the physics of intrinsic rotation in tokamaks and the realization that asymmetric, thermal ion loss is a significant mechanism on determining a source of rotation at the edge of the plasma that then is transported into the core.
_	After a few moments of fighting, the teens come to the realization that Dan and Patrick are using actual lasers to play.
_	Kismet's final wartime mission, however, brings him to the realization that Lamont has turned traitor and threatens the Allies plans to liberate France.
_	A violent confrontation between the two Supermen ensues, at the end of which Kal-L comes to the realization that this created Earth-Two had not been a perfect world, since "a perfect earth doesn't need a Superman."
_	The two agree to get a divorce after he comes to the realization that he is, in fact, heterosexual, and wants to get married to another woman, in "The One With Phoebe's Husband".
